Amazing sarees with the most exceptional embroidery and prints encouraged by the Patan Patola Sarees of Orissa. Velvet, silk, organza, brocade, chiffon and georgette were the basis of the fabulous collection, in myriad muted colours. Prints were pure unadulterated ethic while fabrics ranged from cotton, silk, chiffon, georgette, brocades to lush velvets which were blended together for different segments of each garment.
22. Martian Hop - The Ran-Dells (cassette only)
My Spanish descendants come from the Basque country. I found some people in the White pages with my last name. I really want to go and see where I’m from.
Not really knowing if it means the same as honor or heroism, I look it up on the Wordnet.
A student gives her public outcry against oppression in front of the University of Puerto Rico while an army of cops stands at the gates of the university behind her.
Work in advertising on the creative side, and you find out pretty quickly that you only ever get to work with about five genuinely great account people. If you're lucky.
I did always warn you that people and things are not what you think.
I'm now completely lost. You don't connect this with anything that's happened before (in the query)
"If you look at history, the one thing that's certian is that events are accelerating. Things are changing faster and faster, like a ball rolling down a mountain. Our idea is that if things continue to accelerate at this rate, eventually we'll reach overload, cataclysm. We want to provide the relevant soundtrack to this process. Our sound is like this immense cocktail, saturated with all these elements of past music jumbled up with the absolutely modern, like sampling and synthetics.
The Independent names Mark Reynolds and Glenn Crann of Savills as joint receivers “over the business” but they look like property receivers to me.
But I clearly know what I have gained. I can tell you—without a doubt in my mind—that I know Who holds my tomorrows. I can also tell you that I have peace knowing that the Creator of the Universe also planned the existence of Robin Gilbert Luftig. After I was created I truly believe that he stood back, looked at his creation, and smiled.
Thank you so much to everyone who has stopped by over the last few days! I will reply to your lovely comments and emails as soon as I can. I have two Rubie girls home sick today, and tomorrow looks like it will be a repeat performance! So please know I appreciate all of your kind words and comments so very much.
"Any of you who does not give up everything he has cannot be my disciple." Jesus
Accessories: crocheted flower, brads, ribbon
COLESBERG: White policeman arrests car thief during bungled robbery.
When the judge got to Payton they took a look at his rambling hypothesis and long conclusion and decided a 10 year old could not have written nor understand what that poster said. Which is funny since he was still mad at me for making him dumb his project down so I could help him with it. The judge made some comment about how there were big words on his poster and then asked if Payton could read them and if he knew what those words meant. Payton probably did a 'you are a stupid arse' face when he said, "Yes." And then Payton walked away.
Just by taking a look at this woman, sadly, I think I’m less concerned about her alleged stupidity as a parent than her obvious extreme tanning bed overuse/addiction (seriously, the woman is bronze. As in, looks like she’s been dipped in bronze, like baby shoes or something). Yikes.
That there's the UK hardback first edition of Spy in the Vodka by Ross Thomas, published by Hodder & Stoughton in 1967, with a dustjacket designed by Peter Calcott. This is Thomas' debut novel... a statement which may have anyone who's au fait with Thomas' oeuvre, particularly anyone American, scratching their head. After all, as any Ross Thomas enthusiast will tell you, his debut novel – perhaps even his best-known novel – was 1966's The Cold War Swap. And that statement is also true.
Bridget also enjoys weaving her own stories and playful paths around pictures. She has learnt from working in an international children’s multimedia start-up and later for Bayard Press, that working with a publishing team is like having a party with a purpose. She also enjoys sharing her work with young and old at book events and workshops across the world.
I can't edit the photo's to show them close up as the lovely new laptop appears to have a faulty graphics card and has gone back to its previous owner, and the old one is back in use but has had to have a new operating system installed to combat the virus which doesn't seem to be loading the photo editing part of media gallery :(
6) I would allow him to tell me my flaws and shortcomings
Carl Sagan
2011, Germany/France/UK/USA, directed by Paul W.S. Anderson
While doing some research the other day, I found a March 1971 House & Garden article titled "Wake Up To Color and Breakfast". The article featured eight designers who were asked to set a breakfast table or tray in any setting that they liked and with any menu of their choosing. Needless to say, some of the breakfast table settings were rather elaborate, although I'm sure the designers really wanted to give the magazine some photos with pizazz.
The next thing I did was use pecans in place of the hazelnuts. Having all three nuts for the loaf I proceeded with the recipe.
Just a week later, Peter was with James and John on the Mount of Transfiguration seeing the Lord along with Moses and Elijah. After impetuous Peter voiced the humanistic opinion that they should build three tabernacles which according to Luke9:33were words, “not knowing what he said.”
The Infernal Devices is a really fun, YA series to escape into. It is not overly complicated or literary (in otherwords, it’s an easy read), but sometimes that is exactly what you need. For me, Clockwork Prince was the perfect book to read between books 3 & 4 in George R.R. Martin’s incredibly complex A Song of Ice and Fire series. I really do care about the characters and want to know what is going to happen to them. There is much we have learned by the end of Clockwork Prince, but there is still so much more we do not yet know. I can’t wait to learn the answers to all of my questions. It is with eager anticipation that I await the next and, I believe, final installment.
Pewter Suitor - 4.4% - Amber Bitter.
i always love when people include tours of their homes on their blogs, and it's always nice when it's easy to click and get to. so, i thought i'd include mine on here, just for fun. i'm also including little descriptions and stuff, with as much info about where i purchased things, what i made, etc (even though pretty much everything i own is vintage and/or from a thrift store).
Has used the know-how to enable him to produce the licensed product. If there is no licensed product, then some statement that attests to the worth of the know-how should be given.
I love you all.
No, there's no photos or anything. Are you kidding? My mom wasn't hopping around preserving the moment in pictures, for chrissakes. She wanted to watch Cinderella! She hadn't seen it since the fifties!
Wasps are hunting under leaves
A Room of One’s Own – by Virginia Woolf
Ossobucho of Pork in red Lagrein wine served on thyme polenta
Cut the tofu into shapes that resemble French fries. In a large resealable storage bag or in a shallow bowl, add the flour and the spices. Add the tofu fries to the bag or bowl and toss them around gently until the tofu is covered in the seasoned flour.
Howdy Peeps ~ I have been so swamped with "stuff" since getting back from vacation this week. Everything is piling up and I haven't had much time to stamp or scrapbook. UGH! So today I thought I'd pull out a few more pages from my Alaska Project & show them to you. Once again I've used the Simple Stories Destination Kit along with stamps from Unity.
So very low. I'm refusing visitors. I cry when I think about my children. I feel like I'm no longer 'me'.
- Always make sure to have security’s number.
Will you remember the music?
The central story revolves around Hypatia of Alexandria (born ca. 350 to
If I decide to.
Your turn! Tell me girls! I can't WAIT to hear who you want to lock lips with!!!! xo
In the meantime I’ll share some madness with you.
Today I forced myself to start cleansing my entire life of all the toxins that I feel I have floating around. I started by purging and reorganizing our schooling supplies, then I did a lot of rethinking on how I want our educational adventure to play out over the course of the next few months. I have to say I feel a little better about it now. There is still a huge amount of detoxing that needs to be done but I have some time to get through what I need to get through. Tomorrow is another day.
You see? although it is much better, you need not to be a child prodigy or an exceptionally-creative and critical thinker just so you could be more productive at work. All you need to do is to guarantee yourself that the work you show or demo to your colleagues, especially your immediate superior, is world-class; quality; and worth praising.
One of the most important aspects of a healthy diet that is frequently overlooked is the issue of eating your food uncooked, in its natural raw state.
Zenithfilms has been luckily enough to gain access to equipment, such as cameras and sound equipment, studio space and Victorian themed locations in kind.
It is obligatory for the Islamic nation to invite people to Islam, to propagate it and to subjugate other nations to the Islamic system of ruling.
It is true that there are some things I was dying to blog about but have held off due to privacy concerns. To name a few: the feeling when you find out a girl has a crush on your son, what it feels like to know your son has a crush on a girl, and raging hormones of the teen years and how hard it is to live with a moody teen.
Later she added, “It depends on your whole interpretation of what a weapon is. It’s not a weapon as a knife is a weapon. But a weapon is anything that has the potential to cause harm.”
That’s not a page from Playboy. You could be easily fooled, since it features not only a scantily-clad woman but also a cute little bio and some URLs telling you where you can see more sexy pictures, but it’s actually an advertisement that ran on the back page of our local paper a few weeks ago.
And the only one that can stop them? This guy.
Its one of those beers that you know is not best beer in the world but its a hell of a lot more than you was expecting, and really enjoyable.
Martina and Lisa
Definitely one of my more abstract pieces, though I was going for surrealist at first. A combination of the two maybe even.
If nobody has ever told you that you have a 'Legal Fiction' or a 'Strawman' then reading this could be a VERY interesting experience for you. Your Legal Fiction was created when you were very young, far to young to know any thing about it. But then, it was mean to be a secret as its purpose is to con/swindle you, and it has been used very effectively to do just that ever since it was
BRYAN CRANSTON / Walter White – “BREAKING BAD” (AMC)
I can sympathise with him.
Interested in the Amazon Kindle 2.0 your not the only one in this article I will let you know a little more about it and where you can find some good deals.
Better than it looks
2 large ripe bananas, 1 cup sugar, 1/2 cup vegetable oil, 2 large eggs, 1 tsp vanilla extract, 1 3/4 cup flour, 1 tsp baking powder, 1 tsp salt, 1/2 tsp baking soda, 3/4 cup chopped walnuts
As Marvin Olasky said: “A job should employ God-given talents in a way that glorifies him.” As an artist myself – I take the realistic approach too. From seeing Harrington draw, he really does a good job with his techniques to make the picture come alive. I know Harrington will be great with his career, and I wish him the best with the plans God gives him in the future to come.
Through the media we soon leaned that Pretoria had been hit by a massive car bomb, detonated in front of the Nedbank Plaza Building in Church Street, the location of the South African Air Force Head Quarters. At the time, I thought it was a rather foolishly planned attack. If I were a terrorist I would have planted a second bomb, blowing SA Police Headquarters to kingdom come as well. Maybe they did, and maybe the bomb was defused. I would never know. All I knew for sure, was that months after that massive explosion in Church Street I was still convinced that Police Head Office was next to be targeted by terrorists, and every day that uneasy and precarious feeling of fear and uncertainty dominated my life.
I had a wee chat with Gary Smailes over at BubbleCow. I'm finding this blog ever so useful at the moment. There is a wealth of advice about how to get published on the site. Plus you can sign up for the writing gang and get a weekly newsletter, and every now and again this little box pops up where you can type in a question and Gary really answers. I can say that now, because I typed in a question and got an answer, a couple of recommendations of books to read and got a sneak peek at the soon to be revealed question and answer page.
“THE YEARS WITHOUT a U.S. PRESIDENT, 2008 – 2012″
“Shortly afterwards, about 13 other guys entered the warehouse in a four-ton truck. They started loading clothes, perfume and other items,” Labans said.
I have tried so many anti-acne products but most of them won’t do the job the way it claimed to be. Some even drastically made my skin worse. Everytime I go to a beauty bar, I would comb every corner and read the product literature hoping that I would find something that would work better on me.
and I sold him the last of my 3 television sets for 5 dollars.
These are the words of a childhood nursery rhyme that so many of us would have giggled and laughed to at the expense of tickles from an adult. Up until today I had never really thought about questioning this innocent rhyme, but just like that shocking video of day old chicks getting slaughtered in my first blog, another internet video reached my inbox today.
Bob and Louis were too big for the ottoman, so they didn’t take much notice of it (plus, Louis didn’t really go for furniture). But Pickles loves the ottoman, so it seemed only natural to rename it for her.
Caleb Stacy, a business administration major from SUNY Brockport, references what he calls “the theory of entitlement.”
Here’s a wiki that helped our decision making:
Hope you all have a wonderful day and I can't wait to go pick Talan up this afternoon!! :)
The judgment relates to Mr Zikalala’s 2006 blacklisting of analysts critical of former president Thabo Mbeki, and the SABC’s coverage of elections in Zimbabwe in 2005.
So I went into Mr Rand thingy and asked him to crank out a number for me with the lucky winner being Shirl from Creations by Shirl...Congratualations Shirl and thank you for all your lovely comments you always leave me..Please send me your slow mail address to 'bronwen_beekman at yahoo.com' so that I can arrange for your prize to be sent.
I have been eagerly waiting for this book for quite some time now, and it's FINALLY here! If you haven't done so already, you need to head to your nearest bookstore or Amazon.com and pick up a copy of "Wedding Chic: 1,001 Ideas for Every Moment of Your Celebration" by the one and only Colin Cowie. It might just be your best Christmas present this year!
Body: HANDYMAN
Then they got in the tiniest hottubbenshag in Switzerland and had some killer sex I am guessing.
So what did this taste like? Honestly in many ways it tasted like movie theater popcorn with alot of butter. The butter is what you taste first and then you get the sticky salty bites of the fish roe and finally you are left with the flavors of the actual roe (slightly fishy). Yes it gets in your molars and yes you will continue to taste that roe so if you aren’t into bottarga, this might be a bit intense for you. I loved it.
Paul put his past misdeeds behind him, is focused on the spiritual reality, and is reaching forth to obtain the hope of Christ’s return. Wow! Yes this is a long post but it was worth it to see all that wasn’t it! Man, oh man… what a cool chapter. Now for the final verse for today;
Do not sit down, always stay standing.
Because, you see, observing the harmful presence of non-Whites wouldn't be progressive.
Me: Ohhhhhhhhh, right.
How much higher? Two-hundred feet? I don't know.
Stamps: Bordering on Romance, A Little Birthday Cheer
If this book were a movie it would likely be rated R for strong language throughout, violence, and depictions of death and violence
Bit depth : 8 bits
If you're a fan of a casual, relaxed, cozy, at-ease decor style, this publication is pure eye candy.
I think it's time to update my bucket list and review my year in detail. Only then will I be able to see what 2012 might hold for me.
320 vinyl rip with scans!
To find Mammoth Beers, you literally need to head for the mountains as Mammoth Brewing distributes only from Truckee down to Kern County along the High Sierras. You can also stop by Mammoth's Tap room open daily from 10am-6pm at 94 Berner Street in Mammoth Lakes. Two ounce tasting samples are free.
Update - Her last last reply before this post was to tell me to stop tweeting her or she'll block me. Since then, she's sent two more tweets. She's mad she didn't get a link in this blog. Seriously? LOL!
The whole piece is a must-read but I will put a teaser below:
#1 doubles: Adam White/Colin Spencer defeated
Guess who's back from London! And not just back, suffering from post-London depression too. I have a terrible cold that I always get when I come home from a vacation. London is awesome and I can't wait to go back (which, hopefully, will be in December). I saw the mummies in the British Museum, the dinosaurs in the Natural History Museum, one of the first Dyson vacuum cleaners in the Science Museum (it was pink!), nothing in Tate Modern (I still can't believe that any of those paintings qualify as art), and all the Monets, Manets and Picassos in the National Gallery. Oh yes, and I watched Inception in the BFI IMAX, the largest screen in Europe. It's my new favorite film (and I'm definitely coming back to this cinema)!
Old Dill is the blinded 7th member of the rogue Scout group, and alone possesses the knowledge of how to overcome the trials facing would-be thieves of the hoard. He will need to be brought along, or Powers will have to be used to gain the information otherwise.
A pint of beer to rinse it down,
Oh? And Tom? He was fairing pretty well himself. You'd think after five or six hours with someone you'd run out of topics to discuss but with Tom it kept on rolling, like a salt water taffy pull continually stretching and turning to make the truly perfect texture. Our chatter wasn't non-stop, it involved pauses and breaks, which usually means you feel comfortable enough with the other person to be alright with the silence, but it was full and alive and familiar and, by the end, I wanted to hold his hand down that multicolored street.
The restoration covers finally came down in February 2008 and I took the chance to get a few photos. Although it still remains unopen to traffic for now.
Completely ignore the real issue - that gender queers have already trashed marriage altogether.
All I want to do is walk, for hours, and lay down and write. There is no city for me to walk to from here. There is Culver City but it is less a city and more a movie facade of a Disney World-like town with pretend vintage street posts and cafes that are too shiny and too new. There is writing in me now, though, more than there was before. I have the small lino block we bought on Granville Island sitting on my desk, stately, on top of a pile of tiny notebooks, none of them perfect like those red ones with improper binding. I also did make lentils and brown rice, and I bought nutritional yeast. They were delicious. There doesn't ever seem to be enough. Enough time, enough work, enough food, enough writing, enough sky, enough distance to walk. For a few days though, there was just enough and not too much.
Joe Abercrombie recently gave an update about the status of A Red Country, his latest book placed in the world of the First Law trilogy, albeit placed years later but with some familiar characters cropping up. Abercrombie starts his post out:
I've been in my "dark" phase for the last 7 months by taking on dark and gritty SF.
Heat a pan and pour the ghee and the oil.
Bloody Idiot
Barbara Mason- Give Me Your Love
Meltwater and the PRCA have stood alone in challenging the NLA’s licensing scheme both in the courts, and in the Copyright Tribunal, on behalf of PR agencies, in-house PR teams and all other business users of the Internet. If unchallenged, the NLA’s scheme would have increased costs not only for Meltwater customers but also for all users of commercial media monitoring services, many of whom are PRCA members ...".I have just heard from my blogging colleague Asim Singh that Associated Press is commencing proceedings against Meltwater in the United States -- so I think we can assume that this conflict has gone global.
And she lives on. A 2002 show at New York’s York Theatre called Red Hot Mama featuring cabaret artist Sharon McKnight brought Sophie’s set back to life for the first time in over thirty years.
So now that I am unemployed I have far more time than I know what to do with, which is of course is a lie because anyone who knows me is well aware that I am always working on some sort of project. My days are generally filled resume sending and filling out applications. When that is not being done I am going to move full speed ahead in cranking out the real rarities in my collection- the tapes and vinyl. Just today I have ripped three cassette releases and here is the first batch. Like I told you in my previous On the Might of Princes post that I wasn't done posting rarities from the band or related projects. Here is a probably little known solo project from the band's guitarist/singer Jason Rosenthal called I'd Rather Be Flying. Heavily influenced by Lou Barlow/Sentridoh and lo fi tape label stuff he created this moniker to record music under. Recorded all to four track Rosenthal displayed the same type energy, emotion and sincerity that he did with On the Might of Princes only through a acoustic guitar and some tape loops/guitar noise. The first track called "Standing On the Shore Watching You Drown" is featured on a emo/indie tape compilation called Like Two Kites Flying. Volume 1 which came out on the Sweden based Communication Records and Mandarin Fanzine. The interesting thing about this song is that it did get turned into a early On the Might of Princes song that was recorded on a unreleased demo via reel to reel so most likely this will be the only opportunity for On the Might of Princes fans to hear the original song that was reworked by the band but never released. Who knows maybe one day they'll let people hear that unreleased demo... The other track is a super lo fi cover of Sonic Youth's "Shadow of a Doubt". I am fairly certain this track was never released anywhere. Jason recorded it and gave me a copy.
B) The thirteen year old virgin priestess creating a triangle
Just so you know, so that we are not under any illusions here. I am 5'2". My boobs are big, and so is my arse. I have wide hips and hold all my weight on my thighs and behind. I am however, lucky to have a small waist, although that doesn't mean that I don't sometimes appreciate a bit of help in the 'sucking in' department, especially across the tummy.
If large theaters are rare, small ones are unknown. This absence of liking for the drama is doubtless part of morality for American society, who, having no theaters, do not go each evening to laugh at cuckolded husbands, to applaud happy lovers, and to look with indulgence on adulterous wives. The Americans are moral because they have no plays; they have no plays because of their morality. This is cause and effect in one.
This is my gift to you.
Telling the mirror all of her sad stories
The Colts are going to have their work cut out for them this week, going into their old home of Baltimore, playing against a team of players that not only wouldn't be saleable in Indianapolis but would previously have never been saleable in Baltimore, either. And should they survive that test, they will have to either face this year's most balanced team (the Chargers) or their old nemesis New England. It's not an easy road. But perhaps there should be no easy road for a midwest champion.
And so we set off, Through a wee gate
Well, if you have made it this far.. CONGRATULATIONS!! Sorry for such a long post, but we had lots and lots of fun to share.
However, she's really into the whole animal print theme. That's really funny to me. Over the summer, I re-did the kids bathroom. Blue walls, brown shower curtain, and everything accent in animal print. She hated it! Or so she said. I'm starting to wonder...
The DH and I enjoyed a piece while we watched tv last night drizzled with the port/cabernet sauce. I did not love the texture of this cake. The cornmeal in it made it more like cornbread to me and cornbread and sweet figs just did not seem to go together. But it was interesting. Check it out and try it for yourself.
Nevertheless, he ends up blabbing about this stuff as if he never heard anything I have said or said before. I know he said I should lay low because I’ll be graduating soon. I KNOW THAT. THIS IS MY LIFE. I KNOW THAT IF I LET THIS FALL, I’M DOOMED.
Here are some of the quotes from the Fast Company article:
You are so pretty in your smokey glass shape. I can just see you all dolled up in a white drum shade trimmed in black, looking all smart and sophisticated.
For this design you will need.
5) Cost-Effective Compassion The difficulties in assessing the impact of antipoverty efforts only magnify the need for understanding the impacts of different types of programs.
To them, the so-called leaders, as virulent African breeders of note, the very idea of any legal constraints on breeding, like measures propagated, implemented and enforced by many civilised or half-civilised country outside the African continent, as solution to their overpopulation problem, is quite unthinkable, or as some would say, "Too ghastly to contemplate". Instead of preaching moderation, African leaders urge their illiterate followers to "Go forth and multiply" and promise them monetary rewards as an additional incentive, encouraging them in their belief that their breeding is an assurance policy against famine and pestilence.
Since marketing is his niche, you can’t argue his logic. The honey pot allure of self-esteem workshops is power dollars from low hanging fruit. I’m sure it shall be successful.
(The same group that crank out hundreds of new laws each year designed to keep the rest of us in line!)﻿
I wish I could go back to 15 year old, high school me and let myself know how much better my valentine would eventually become! Even if its not a significant other, we all have someone to love. While some say its a silly holiday and they may be right, it’s almost like Thanksgiving in the sense of…you are supposed to be thankful everyday and not just the 4th Thursday in November. Well, you’re supposed to show the people you love that you love them everyday, not just the 14th of February. But sometimes a little invented holiday gives us the excuse we need to show a little more love. And there ain’t nothing wrong with that.
end, but we did know the news
10) The sentimental Pollyanna in 1960 made Walt cry at the studio screening but failed at the box office. Walt concluded that the title was off-putting for young boys.
Scientists’re still on conducting research,
Van Slyke is the son of former Pirates outfielder, the wacky Andy Van Slyke, and I've said before that I'm convinced Bowman only printed a card of Scott so they could use the photo here. He wasn't considered a big prospect at the time, which is evidenced by the back of the card in which the first line of his resume says "Placed sixth on Great Lakes roster in 2007 with 89 hits."
The victims who had only one kidney removed during the first carve-up were suchered and returned to imprisonment, to live until they would get killed for their other vital organs, when the right buyer is found. According to Carla del Pontae, the Serbs held in this monstrous human stable Josef Mengele would envy, begged to be killed.
turtle
At first, children’s programs were meant to do little more than stop an unattended sprog from sticking his tongue in an electrical outlet but somewhere along the line they started slipping in nasty messages telling these damned kids they were unique, smart and had opinions worth sharing.
For example, in a spoken interaction it would be daft to assume that each speaker used the same degree of standard/non-standard language or to assume that a speaker was always being interactional rather than transactional, so the same is true to an extent for written texts: they may exhibit some features of one mode dimension at one point and then another aspect of that mode dimension at another point. A written text might start as a formal and transactional piece, but develop into something more informal and interactional. Look for shifts within texts, but also of course between them. Always provide evidence for your observations though, because you need to show the examiner that what you are saying is linked to actual examples of language in the texts, rather than vague generalities plucked from thin air.
For all of his commitment to liberty, and I believe that commitment is genuine, he has a blind spot. He still thinks that liberty and union are compatible goals at this point in our history. He still cannot distinguish between respect for the sacrifices of our military, and the fact that they are being used for evil purposes.
One always wants to have a snappy response to annoying arrogance. I always imagine being there that day when the smooth-faced, arrogant swell tells the hard-scrabble, scruffy farmers "I smoke." I want to see his face as he hears the "dog-turd" response. I want to hear all the locals laugh in appreciation. I also want to say that to all arrogant, insufferable people who taunt and annoy with their presumed superiority based on where they live, where they have been or where they ate lunch "So does a dog turd... "
The controversy came as the head of the Anglican Church Rowan Williams visited Rome on Sunday for a private meeting with the Pope, followed by joint prayers during Vespers at the monastery of Rome's Church of San Gregorio al Celio.
Rowan went to meet his new pediatrician last week. It made me appreciate how caring and good with people his previous pediatrician was. But all is well. After the appointment, we had to go to a different floor with some paperwork to get his vaccines.
By Anne Meyer KWCH 12 Eyewitness News There are a few Kentucky fans in Wichita, but not many. In fact the closest official Wildcat alumni watch party is in Kansas City.
Zune:
Sleep: I wish I could sleep all day and night. I am exhausted.
So ladies, pay attention to your bodies. If you don't feel good, it is not normal! And- don't be stupid, life is so much better when you're happy and perhaps(shocking!), a bigger size !
Sorry the photo here is tiny but it was all I could manage. Just go to the link in the caption to see a larger photo.
3/4 lb andouille sausage
Life will turn upside down again.
It took 70 firefighters to put out the blaze. Based on the video they didn't do a very good job.
If I pass the class, I will not be hanging out my shingle and opening up A Girl And Her Gun Shooting School. I am getting the certification because if I am going to be working at a range, I think it is important for me to continue to hone skills, become more educated in the field and get proper qualifications. I will be working with and under John and I will be attending several more trainings. I hope to go to TDI soon. I have lots and lots and lots left to learn and I know it.
I would rate Palty bleach a 3/5 because, it really is effective in bleaching compared to the other brand which I used before. But of course it does damage your hair. However it's not that expensive. It cost around SGD14? But the amount of dye given is very little. Even a middle hair length like me, needs two boxes! So if you ever wanna try palty, it's better to have two boxes if you have longer hair!
Who to offend
A good chunk of Cadburys milk chocolate, grated
Besides our Prime Minister is the President of the India chapter of the Obama fan club... in other words he is no different from Chris Matthews and gets tingles at the very sight of Obama. So no worries, Tiger!
The May issue of Real Simple featured an article titled
03. Can’t be friends (prod. by Makhi the Heartbeat)
He is, understandably, disappointed.
This has been a wonderful week “off” for me at home, although I spent the first two days working at the HeidiSongs office answering phones and emails, and trying to help my husband out in whatever way I could. After that, I spent the Tuesday night and most of Wednesday creating the handout for my presentation on classroom management that I will be giving at the California Kindergarten Conference and the Southern California Kindergarten Conference in January and February. Thursday was a day for cooking and giving thanks, and now here we are on Friday! Time sure flies when you are having fun!
My lay-out is basically the same, but i used an image from Fawn Palmer called Chiharmony and those that visit me often, knows that i use one of these often, just love the versatility and there quite a few of these, just visit the STORE and see the variety and much more...........:))
so full of so much GOODNESS that it tends to suck it out from the rest of us at
We got to the ward and they checked me in to a laboring room. They told me to go to the bathroom, put on a gown, and put on a belt for the monitors. I really didn't like the belt at all because it put way too much pressure onto my abdomen. I remember telling my husband that it was making me feel sick.
to sink in brazen glory
Co-headlining with Silverstein, Escape the Fate, Alesana, and A Skylit Drive
P.S My uncle even tried to wake me up by 9:30 A.m before I had that dream. I decided to sleep for few more minutes. You wouldn’t believe that breathtaking and nerve-wrenching dream within a dream only happened for an hour, would you? It lasted like a lifetime. I checked the time and realized it was only close to 10:30 A.m.
psychic practices, healers lead clients into what they say is
Assistant General Secretary (Equalities), Unite the Union
ARTIST: Heh. Was this in Rob’s studio?
Pong Tai Hai, 10 pcs, soak in water and remove seed plus fibre
-3-
The first day of the new season and Lily bursts in late. From this moment Nina associates Lily with disruption and begins to view her as a usurper. Lily bursts everywhere - at work, at home, in her bed. With Lily now within it, Nina's unstable mind is at the point of breakdown. The lights of the studio shut down when she is stressed, far more serious than scattered horror beats. She doesn't know what is happening. People seem to invade her or are let in without realising ('Susie in the office' is always ready with information, a slang, a code). She hallucinates. Going out of her mind and growing out of her skin like the butterflies on her wall. She is "moulting", as Sheila O'Malley describes it, into adulthood and into a creature of pure imagination.
I am so unbelievably thankful for my parents and the example they have set for me of a loving, committed marriage.
Maybe it was the idea of being out there when most everybody else was still asleep that was appealing to me most but there was a definite tranquility that was working for me and I was feeding off it. My music collection on Google Music keeping me company.
As well as containing her first concerted embrace of
“If other people are saying it, it is special, but it is even more special if your opponents are saying it. It is very special because you are playing against them week in week out and every single player does everything to win and in the end if they make up their minds that I’m the best player it is a big honour.
My Version:
In all honesty, I was getting a bit tired of the contest, especially with having to work with items that I didn’t like. Frank’s character developed as a way to personify my own negativity and subvert the entire transmog beauty contest thing at the same time. In that sense, Frank was a roaring success. Frank gave me a way to have fun with the contest after I was past the point of having fun with it. He also really did take on a life of his own, and creating an outfits to suit his personality was an interesting and challenging experience.
Finally, I will say that at first I was really mad at Alexis about laser tag, and although I haven’t particularly liked the trajectory of her character lately, she was redeemed by still wanting to play with her dad. Again, pulling the wool over his eyes! I’m glad she is embracing the fun-loving side of the Castle personality. She’s still her father’s daughter, and next year she’ll be at Columbia, close enough for Castle to annoy when he wants some comic relief. Although, hopefully he’ll have enough to keep him occupied. And I do mean Beckett. Wink wink!
The one thing I won’t be talking about in detail is exactly what I did and who I notified when I executed the promotions for both SECTOR C and The Rent-A-Groom. Some of you have asked and I've impolitely ignored you. I don't, however, mean to be rude or make that a personal statement directed toward you. But I know the first thing you guys (as in the collective "you") will do will be to inundate these same sites the way the handful of freebook sites I mentioned when I outlined the Steel Magnolia Press launch strategy got swamped. They’ll follow the trail back here and I’ll lose any goodwill I’ve built with the owners. It’s not a matter of protecting my sources. It’s a matter of protecting my relationships with them. And in this biz, those relationships are very important -- and very rare.
I've been walking around the lake at Como Park about three times a week. The scenery has been so wonderful I had to take my camera one day, so I'm sharing.
In prison, there are no screaming or whining children or spouses asking you to do something else for them, or screaming at you because you didn't. Doesn’t that make you want to go out and do something illegal?
1. Boden is a sleeper! He naps during the day and sleeps well at night I LOVE THIS! For a breastfed baby he is doing especially well in my opinion. I nurse allot during the day (I actually wake him lots of time to feed him!) but at night he goes 3.5 hr stretches consistently, that is WAY more than I got with Eli even at the 4-5 month mark. I truly hope Bo keeps this up! The little nugget doing what he does best - sleeping!
The tissue barometer has been way up there.
Brew Exchange is a business venture of five friends who have all called Austin home for decades. They also own and operate Kung Fu Saloon in Austin, Houston and soon their third installation in Dallas.
H found an art studio and networked with other local artists. I was a burgeoning DJ. H always accompanied me to my weekly radio show on Dream FM; a pirate station which was particularly popular with the petty inmates of Armley jail as my fan mail will testify.
At a certain point, I believe the Pentagon will probably send people in to the TV headquarters in the US.
This is Josh. He's been volunteering every week day morning since long before we moved here. He knows most everyone by name and greets them with a smile.
I picked up the Urban Decay Naked palette after scouring the internet for the best neutral eye shadows. I've been using it the past few days and I LOOOOVE it. I'll try to take close ups of my eye makeup in the upcoming shots. Anyone have recommendations on good combinations of the colors on it? I've been trolling YouTube for ideas.
Have you ever baked French yogurt cake?
On the other hand, paedophiles are perhaps the one sure-fire way to get the rabid right wing press to give a hoot about inequality. This pervert dumping could therefore be a progressive development.
* He gives a silly explanation of the phrase "sow wild oats," placing its origins in the Middle Ages, when in fact it dates back to antiquity.
I am so excited about the plans that I have for a certain area I have outside in my yard.
Ink: Crumb cake, Palette Noir
It's time, once again, for a list of the strange words people Google that land them on my blog.
Brazil/Jungle Drums by Dex Romweber Duo
Thanks to the revolution that digital brought in photography, now this hobby is acessible to everyone, because the costs have been considerably lowered compared to the times when film was used.
4. Growing up Victoria- http://growingupvictoria.blogspot.com/2012/04/my-brother.html - I picked Victoria’s blog because she is only a 12 year old girl and took on the challenge and did wonderfully! Her attitude and perspective is refreshing!
Sage Derby
Hello chicks!
She's wasn't fat anything, she was this cute little 5 year-old-ish petite frame that would ask, ever so politely, for her pancakes everyday from the chef. So much that her mom forbade her to eat anymore pancakes the following day (after her N servings). lol.
Importing labour is only a temporary solution, and one that has huge social and economic consequences - as it maintains unemployment, rather than addressing the problem of why there are unfilled vacancies. Furthermore the imported work force may well become dependent on the benefit system themselves, especially in times of high unemployment.
Savannah has been celebrating St. Patrick’s Day with parade since 1825. What started out as a modest affair has turned into one of the biggest St. Patrick’s Day celebrations in the country. Savannah’s parade draws crowds of over 400,000 people.
Think about it - is there a badder mofo than the original evil bitch, Maleficent? This chick seriously creeps me out. From her weird horns to her skeezy bird to her creeptastic walking stick - and oh yeah, the fact that she TURNS INTO A DRAGON - she oozes evil. I love to hate her. Or, I'm scared crapless of her. Take your pick. (Probably a little of both)
GLOBAL CONFERENCE: Nuclear power for Africa?
Still, we are left with a pretty ugly picture as the Republicans, especially the Tea Party febrile, fevered, fervent Republicans, led by that cunt Sarah Palin, deny any responsibility for their nasty, bitter language that has become the language of politics in the US. They shrug and genuinely think they have nothing coming to them, that the hateful lies, fiction and running political interference has no impact at all on people's perceptions.
(Sorry, had to go there).
Look at the size of that thing!
To practise the vocabulary for parts of the body, ask the children to draw and describe a monster giving them free rein to add as many of each body part as they want and to colour it as they wish. (Singing about it is optional!)
and last weekend the meeting promoted
For a moment the bird dipped a few feet. It flapped its enormous wings furiously forcing itself to rise again. Suddenly, a blur shot out from the other side of the nest and landed on its feathery back. A set of razor sharp fangs drilled deeply into bird’s neck. The bird’s wings thrashed wildly, talons gripping the load tightly. The cat that had landed on top of it clung tightly to its back making it difficult to flap, the teeth that were sunk deep into bird’s throat crushing the windpipe made it difficult to breathe, and still, the bird would not let go of its load.
Dimensions listed in description are wrong. See Product Images, I’ve posted an image of the correct dimensions of the item I received. Use them for planning only, Northern Tool may change suppliers or have multiple suppliers. Added metric dimensions.
when do sth
just email me and i can include those at an extra 15% of retail.
In the next couple of post we shall see how a good diet helps in coping up with the needs and stress of postpartum period,the diet and need for breast feeding ,the diet for a healthy weight loss after delivery and of course a healthy way to exercise off those unwanted kilos....
Some of the fun things that I did on this piece are....throwing paint onto my almost finished background (scary!)...and playing some more with the Pan Pastels...check out the moon ~ the tower is masked and the moon is topped up with some white PP, and then I used an eraser to remove some of the PP where the craters are...this made the moon shine brighter. Then I just added some stars around the moon with a white gel pen.
I’m 2 weeks away from my first race of the season, the Penny Harvest Run For Change. I did this race last year as part of the Something New experiment and feel it’s only fitting to return. Today was a hill run and, despite the steep climbs of the Bay Ridge, I still brought my time in under last years finish time. Looking forward to kicking the tires and lighting the fires 14 days from today!
* missing hanging toy but have replace with another toy
Across from Lincoln Park was a curious building that really caught our eye. It was a Bath House. Very spiffy looking and also labeled a place to see on a sign in Lincoln Park. I found this a little surprising. The term “Bath Houses” brings to mind people doing things that usually aren’t advertised in city parks. We never did figure out the story about this building while we were down there, but I did a little sleuthing after I came home. Apparently Bath Houses were built by the city at the turn of the century to give people a place to shower because there were concerns about sanitation. This particular Bath House has been turned into Condos. Cute.
NEOS is an award-winning, not-for-profit collective of artists, makers and galleries in the north east who open their doors to the public each September. VSA’s Easter Anguston Farm has been a venue for the last four years.
I've done it! I have hit my first milestone... 20 pounds, gone! Yes, I feel fantastic, but only 1/3 fantastic -- I've still got a long way to go, but in the meantime I am most definitely doing the ohhh I am 20 pounds lighter happy dance!
I’d use our schools to teach one generation of Americans that our factories and our cars will cause a new Ice Age, and I’d muster a straight face so I could teach the next generation that they’re causing Global Warming.
Holder rejected widespread criticism by Republicans and some Democrats in Congress over how the suspect was interviewed by FBI agents for only about an hour before he stopped co-operating and then was read his Miranda rights, providing him a lawyer and full US constitutional legal rights.
The family dogs are waiting for Fankhauser’s return, his wife said.
I have been inspired by a paper that was written in the eighties “crosswind kite power”, by Miles L. Loyd, of Lawrence Livermore National Laboratory, California, a theory which has also been discussed by Makani Power. I am trying to design a machine that will be controlled by an operator; much like a power kite is controlled, by pulling on the tethers. The cost must be minimal; I am presently building a 2.5m2 prototype, the airframe of which will cost about £15 to build. I hope to have a complete system that will generate 1kW for less than £50.”
I'm sorry this is so short, but I am addicted to you and can't pass a single day without telling you.
For few glorious weeks this became my reality. To be fair, I should mention that he is the one guy I didn’t meet on Match.com. I met him on another site. Okay, okay… it was a site for hook-ups. I had just had one of the longest dry spells EVER and I knew I didn’t want a relationship. This was pure, unadulterated, unapologetic rebounding.
I guess there's just no better place than this. My heart belongs to the Arlberg.
I've done my colouring for this card with my coloured pencils. I thought the minis would be easier to colour with them also than with markers...but it wasn't really.
Great!!
I applaud you and your unsolicited, uncomfortably personal, overly informative, well meaning rhetoric.
3. Boneless pork loin roast, $1.97/lb. at Sprouts (through 2/2/11)
Bachmann: the people of Iraq should pay us
Cannonball Redding - Atlantic City Bacharachs
I search Britney Spears on both Yebol and Google. For both websites, their top 25 overlapped a lot with common websites. The top two for Yebol included Britney’s official website and next was Britney’s offical fan page. For google, the first one was also Britney’s offical website. The second one that came up, however, was her wikipedia page. Wikipedia didn’t even come up at all in the top 25 for Britney on Yebol. I think that Yebol came up with better website in their top ten because they brought my to more offical websites, like her myspace and youtube pages. Google on the other hand brought me to articles about her in magazines and other less credible places.
But when ye shall see the abomination of desolation, spoken of by Daniel the prophet, standing where it ought not, (let him that readeth understand,) then let them that be in Judaea flee to the mountains:
That premature babies cost ten times more than healthy babies?
I sampled this and blogged about it almost exactly one year ago. I wasn't using the rating system, more trying to guess the hops in the beer. This movie Avatar looks like it will be badass. Anyway, I'm drinking this one in my snifter goblet. Orangish ruby color. Grassy, piney, citrusy hops nose coming off of a poofy white head. Oh snap, they got Leonard Garcia fighting Manny Gamburyan. Hell yeah. This beer is a strong hop Christmas bomb as only Sierra Nevada can make. Moderate to high carbonation to cut through the strong taste and facilitate a rather quick finish. The hops are rather grapefruity and grassy, probably Chinook again, mixed with some Cascade. Again, Sierra Nevada all day. Funny how the WEC has the most competitive fights as opposed to some of the more recent lumbering displays we've seen on the UFC. I am still a big fan of the balanced hop bombs and this one isn't it. I sense some caramel malt in there, but that's all I get, a sense. High 3 Star.
Colin
Who do you think we should vote?
My group BFA exhibition is in less than 2 weeks! It’s going to be cool and the show is called Cool. so if you’re in Arizona, come by from January 24 to 27. My thousand paper cranes and my prints from Japan are going to be on display. And my group has some super cool stuff so be excited!!!
This giveaway will end on 11/20/11
Effective last night, we rolled back the Smashwords Terms of Service to its pre-February 24 state.
I am thrilled ... I can only say thankyou to my fellow members who have really supported me through thick and thin
The hops come from the Rostrevor hop gardens in Eurobin which is the largest hop gardens on the mainland. Ben was invited to sample some experimental hop varieties in the hope that he would find something interesting for a new brew. This particular variety is a cross bred type which combines a nice high alpha acid level with a load of aromatic strength as well. This means that a single hop flower can be used to give a beer the bitterness it needs as well as the smell. And this thing absolutely goes off!
Confession... Editor Ben loved so many of the projects in the Folk linkup but can't use many due to the quality of photography. So... please heed my advice above and practice. Maybe I'll do a quick lesson on an easy way to photograph your projects for submission... sound like a plan?
to burst forth,
Nevertheless, I was delighted when I reached under her today to pull out this instead of an egg:
Footprints tell me I’m going to be your man;
because it really really seems like you dont care about her happiness at all.
I’m having lunch all week with different UK editors—some in the children’s world and some in the adult world. I’ll start blogging about any interesting tidbits I discover tomorrow. I didn’t want there to be too much distance between when I discussed Janice’s original query and the letter I submitted to Donna. We had actually talked about this project a month or two before I submitted it. If memory serves, I was sitting at Donna’s table at Book Expo when I first pitched her this project.
According to a recent report in the New York Times, investors from China are “snapping up luxury apartments” and are planning to spend hundreds of millions of dollars on commercial and residential projects like Atlantic Yards in Brooklyn. Chinese companies also have signed major leases at the Empire State Building and at 1 World Trade Center, the report said.
Thanks for stopping by and be sure to check out all the Calendar Girls' "secret word" creations on their blogs. See my sidebar for a listing of their blogs.
Easier to resist than wanting to smack him upside the head for offering and tempting you in the first place. A person only has so much self control.
Feed the cats again
My violas are going to seed almost faster than I can deadhead them. I love the seeds, which look like small, creamy pearls.
Mutual Fund Flows
Sprinkle onion, green chili and bell pepper , evenly on top
You're staying with him. After weighing your options and feelings, you have decided to work through this with him, to really make an effort to make the two of you work.
Wages and salaries accrued before the end of the fourteen day period, along with any notice pay, statutory redundancy pay or any protective award for failure to collectively consult are ranked very near the bottom of the list and are often paid at a very minimal amount if at all.”
It is a strange, strange world we live in. While dealing with women, our sense of morality is something unique. The husband may be a recent avatar of Don Juan but he would expect his wife to be the mirror-image of Sati Savitri. A man is free to cast amorous glances drooling all the while and ogle at beautiful and voluptuous girls but a woman’s weak or grudging smile is supposed to send out a wrong signal.
I too, at times, have felt a great hate for those that have taken so much, with no sorrow for what they do.
Within Boston o Jamaica Central: 73.8% o Cleveland Circle: 73.1% o Oak Square: 63.2% o Upper Washington: 58.7% o Jamaica Plain: 58.6%
09 Stand or Fall
"Love is the only rational act."
And he tells me later that he actually felt sorry for me every time we passed the 10's numbers and kept on going. Because he could feel and hear my relief and following disappointment each time. "You moaned at 21, 31, 41....I kind of felt bad for you."
When outsiders who have never heard of God’s law follow it more or less by instinct, they confirm its truth by their obedience. They show that God’s law is not something alien, imposed on us from without, but woven into the very fabric of our creation. There is something deep within them that echoes God’s yes and no, right and wrong. (Romans 2:14-15, The Message)
Well I am finally here in Daytona Beach after almost ending up in Dayton, Ohio, don’t ask just let’s say I am not happy with the travel agent who booked my trip.
nothing short of a miracle.
“That’s amusing. But no.”
Okay so I Definatly ate carbs. I’ve still got 300 calories left and I have burned 100 which is included in the calories I have left. And I can’t eat after 6. So here’s what I’ve eaten.
Gingerfightback should be our looney toons engineer while Dampsquid will be our conductor. Elyse who thinks she is still FiftyFourandaHalf will be tending bar in the club car while MJ, Evil Stepmom will be trying to explain to everyone how 2+2=7 and Ramblings of an Apathetic Adult Baby rambles on about whatever apathetic adult babies ramble on about. Our little crazy train will be filled with laughter and crazy talk of the Glitter E. Yaynus variety.
Paper Mache bird from In Watermelon Sugar in Baltimore (sprayed in Rustoleum’s gold metallic paint)
Blue Valentine—along with that other celebrated relationship drama of 2010, Maren Ade's Everyone Else—attempts to dissect a relationship going south. Instead of Ade's chronologically linear behavioral observation, though, Cianfrance cuts back and forth between Dean (Ryan Gosling) and Cindy's (Michelle Williams) sour current reality and the relationship's more innocent beginnings. In that way (and this is not meant to trivialize the film, by any means), Blue Valentine plays like a far less playful, more serious-minded (500) Days of Summer, where one cut between past bliss and present disillusionment can pack a devastating emotional punch. Cianfrance adds to the contrast between past and present by shooting Cindy and Dean's courtship sequences on a markedly grainier film stock and with a more vibrant color scheme than the present-day scenes, with its slicker look and duller, earthier tones.
I bet you have seen all those “quotes” that people share on Facebook. Sometimes I just get so tired of them. When will it stop? But yesterday I had to reconsider my attitude towards the whole thing. I saw a shorter text on gratefulness (later the same day I found the same text on a blog). It really made me start to think about how often we take things and people for granted.
Pulse the pork and fat in batches in the food processor until finely ground. Place in a large bowl - add the rest of the ingredients and blend with moistened hands just until combined. Wrap in Saran Wrap and press and roll to form a log. Refrigerate overnight or at least a few hours before using.
Premise 1 simply lists the three possibilities for explaining the presence of this amazing fine-tuning of the universe: physical necessity, chance, or design. The first alternative holds that there’s some unknown Theory of Everything (TOE) that would explain the way the universe is. It had to be that way, and there was really no chance or little chance of the universe’s not being life-permitting. By contrast, the second alternative states that the fine-tuning is due entirely to chance. It’s just an accident that the universe is life-permitting, and we’re the lucky beneficiaries. The third alternative rejects both of these accounts in favor of an intelligent Mind behind the cosmos, who designed the universe to permit life. The question is this: Which of these alternatives is the best explanation?
It’s a funny life being a writer, right? Right.
- Fire extinguisher
daddy and sydney put lights on the tree.
Now, maybe it was my heightened adrenaline, something getting the creativity going, but I had a light-bulb moment, a kind of "thought experiment" which has absolutely obsessed me ever since. It was: "What if there was something like a god, who could observe every human and know everything about them; and what if he could see everyone passing and meeting and mostly not meeting and weaving unpredictably from place to place, NEVER aware how narrowly they had just missed an important encounter with someone they knew or someone who might influence their lives? What if humans could be tracked like radioactive particles, bobbing around in a kind of Brownian motion, in patterns, and that the god was sitting there cackling at the powerlessness of these poor humans as they went down that street or took that turning or missed that train or smiled at that person or had this thought caused by that sight or sound or breath of air on their face? What if he could show us all that, and we could observe the almost happenings, the near-misses, and if we could, just by observing, change the tiniest things that affect lives invisibly? And what if we could then tell the story of some of those things, show the inner workings of our world?"
Author: Stefano Barazza (Studio Legale Barazza)
I’m quite enamoured with the whole indie self-publish thing, so I can only see the pros. I always knew I had a story that didn’t fit in the parameters being purchased by traditional publishers. To be honest, I never really tried to force my story to fit that market. When I wrote it, I had no idea that there would be an explosion in e-books or a renaissance for under-used story settings and time periods.
Many believed Gingrich was motivated by revenge as opposed to policy when allowed the shutdown to occur, Senator Tom Delay in his memoir No Retreat, No Surrender wrote, “He told a room full of reporters that he forced the shutdown because Clinton had rudely made him and Bob Dole sit at the back of Air Force One… (After Yizhak Rabin’s funeral, where Clinton refused to discuss the budget as well on the flight) Newt had been careless to say such a thing, and now the whole moral tone of the shutdown had been lost. What had been a noble battle for fiscal sanity began to look like the tirade of a spoiled child. The revolution, I can tell you, was never the same.” Throughout the shutdown Clinton suffered in the polls, but in the end the backlash was against the Republicans instead, whose popularity waned after the shutdowns, and in the 1996 election they actually lost 5 seats in the Congress to Democrats.
I want more ‘island’ in me.
Being a true storyteller isn't about telling someone a story, it's about weaving words so someone is transported through them into my world and my characters, and doing it effortlessly so the reader doesn't realize it's happening. And to do that, I have to live it first. Don't get me wrong, I get there through revisions, but I can make my writing time more efficient if I stand in my story from the beginning.So now before I start, I close my eyes and put myself in the scene first.
your own party for its pandering and lack of all regulation - mainly because
Five slices and 7.5 wings later (shared one with the dog) I realized I may have over ordered. Oh well. Cold pizza is DELICIOUS.
When I got home my postpartum hormones were so strong I could cry at any moment and was barely able to hold back the tears no matter how hard I tried. Now I was home and still exhausted, sore, sitting on ice, bleeding etc. but I didn’t have nurses teaching me how to take care of my son and giving me pain medication every 4 hours. I didn’t come home to the euphoria they show you on TLC’s A Baby Story. I came home to reality. No one talks about reality.
Back button
Please feel free to share your own insights, comments and suggestions for others on this common type of clutter or how you regularly reach for a feeling of relief!
Born of a broken man, never a broken man
The greatest gift of all
Favorite Suburban Italian Restaurant: Italian restaurants are ubiquitous in the suburbs, but too many of them are simply average. But you can find an excellent Italian spot in Woburn, Tre Monte. They offer reasonably priced and hearty portions of tasty Italian staples and their own specialties. In addition, their Bolognese is killer, and I am very picky as to my Bolognese sauce. They also deserve kudos for their Arancini, a great blend of a crisp and crunchy exterior concealing lots of gooey cheese.
Last month BestFriendJosh (who also worked with me for a while) announces that he knows what I Must Do. I must do PR/comms for the small NGOs who can not afford a big agency and don't have internal capacity. I thought it sounded good and forgot about it. But the next morning there was an email from him telling me he'd thought about it all night and it was perfect for me. The email had links to various articles and finally to an advert where a small NGO was looking for just that kind of support. I contacted the NGO in question and voila! First client secured. About a week later I received an email from another NGO asking if I could recommend a comms consultant. ("Why yes, yes I believe that I can). Boom! Client number two. Another organisation (who I spoke to wrt something involving Client No 1) have also asked me to pitch to them (....client No 3 pending). And there you have it. No marketing. Barely any effort and consultancy is happening. My current work contract ends mid-April. I have warned my boss that I am not interested in renewing as is, but with Earth Hour looming we haven't been able to discuss things properly. Hopefully this week. Ideally they would be another client.
of Icarus.
Ps 103:2,3,4,5 Bless the Lord, 0 my soul, and forget not all His benefits: Who forgives all your iniquities, Who heals all your diseases; Who redeems your life from destruction; who crowns you with loving kindness and tender mercies; Who satisfies your mouth with good things, so that your youth is renewed like the eagle’s.
You can´t fit into this box, like a lover
In just over three hours another few thousand hearts broke, another few thousand voters realised just how rotten "democracy" has become.
He doesn't, but not for lack of trying.
“Corporal O’Reilly, you have permission to advance and clear the vehicle.”
74Curse on all laws but those which love has made!
The following 5 tips will tell you how to manage patients with HIV and AIDS in a safe manner.
On January 16, 1974, 200 miles off the coast east of Da Nang, a group of Vietnamese islands known as the Paracel (Hoàng Sa) Islands were approached by Chinese naval ships who showed signs of aggression. In response to the Chinese threat, the Republic of Vietnam (South Vietnam) ordered in their own troops, resulting in a three-day stand-off between China and South Vietnam. President Nguyen Van Thieu of South Vietnam advocated a peaceful negotiation with the Chinese Navy. Unfortunately, reaching out to China turned out to be futile, their intentions to take the islands were quite clear. By January 19, after communication attempts by South Vietnam proved to be impossible, the South Vietnamese Navy opened fire on the Chinese aggressors, quickly sinking one of their ships, killing a Chinese commander and several high ranking officers.
Hugs from Jill and the rest of the designteam
" YES! " I replied.
Lately I’ve been rather content to sweat over the change I see in the distance. The MFA application process is so self-involved and so obnoxious in its ability to wrap even the most calm psyche up into fever that I don’t believe many of us are able to comprehend that life goes on after the results are in. I’ve weighed the possibilities of faculty, area and time. I’ve even panicked over funding, which I had never even considered crying over until various blogs commanded I do so. Now I'm waking up from my hibernation in a daze, like wha? Last year I held onto one waitlist that strung me along by nose all the way through July. This year, I’m writing this from the Southwest terminal of LaGuardia airport at 5am, currently on my way to Chicago to visit the School of the Art Institute in Chicago. I’m somewhere between alive and asleep. Not just because it’s 5:08am in the friggin’ morning, but because I've come to realize that if and when I take one of my offers, I will be starting the next phase of my life which for the past two years has been nothing but some semblance of a dream.
I don’t see Summer again until lunch. “Livvy, that boy has a tattoo!”
He knew Maggio's and Brandow's and others on Half Moon Drive. It's great to know we have that kind of security.
As I followed Ellis through his exams in 1890, 1892, 1894, and 1899, I saw a man who felt worse than the doctors recorded him to be. At each exam his height and weight decreased. His hair went from brown to gray. He was rejected for an increase each time he requested one until finally, in 1902, the doctors recommended an increase to $10.00 per month. By then he was 5' 10" tall, weighed 140 pounds, was 62 years old, and, the doctors noted, was a victim of senile debility. In 1905 the doctors recommended a pension of $12.00 per month.
Jane was the daughter of a pastor and had a very strong spiritual upbringing and not surprisingly this led to her utter devotion to the Christian faith as well. Dr. Leithart discusses many things about how her faith led the way in her writing, how in love she was with God and many other things you may not have known about her.
Anyway, you need to add 1 tablespoon of this "wooster" or "woochester" or "woshestershire" sauce.
If you were literally, creepily following your customers, where would they be? Let’s say you’re the owner of a toy shop. You notice that most of your products are bought by people who have had kids for some reason. After your clients leave your store with their smiling little creatures, where could you imagine them going? The park? The ice cream parlor? The grocery store? Think about the businesses around you with which you share customers, and capitalize on the work they’ve already done. It’s the American way.
For details of workshops and further information please contact Lindel Graham at healinglight@lindel.co.uk or visit the website www.gaiadonheart.com
Critical Beats: Sound Systems
This fortnight's prize is being donated by our regular sponsor Simon Says Stamp and, as usual, they are generously offering our winner a $15 voucher to be spent in their store.
As soon as the door shut, Soren's mouth was on mine. Hard and hungry. My hands were in his silky hair and my leg wound around his waist. I could easily lose myself. I already had one dark lacuna in my memory. I couldn't let myself forget anything else.
If the US was a real country with an effective government we would all be getting quarterly dividend checks from the government instead of having to pay them the outrageous taxes they continue to demand. End the IRS & the Federal Reserve which they unswervingly serve!
Smucker’s Seedless Blackberry Jam with Splenda
Ghana has celebrated the introduction of two new vaccines to prevent pneumonia and diarrhoea – two of the biggest killers of children worldwide.
Your face lights up in the morning. You're the happiest boy in the morning and its impossible to hate the world when you look at me with your amazing grin, wide eyes, and greet me with a coo.
Put it on your plate and enjoy. This little open-faced sandwich's got it goin' on! It has a slight hint of sweetness from the chutney, all that egg and bacon flavor, and a little bit of the kick arugula is famous for. Oh, and it's all on toasted bread with cream cheese. It is so good!
Choose Platforms You Like
Let’s move next to Stanza 6, Book of Dzyan, to aid us in deepening our understanding of Logos. The mystery of Kwan-Yin as representative of Female Logos is touched by this stanza. This knowledge dovetails into the evolution and development of world. Said the Perfected Ones, in Sloka 1 of the same Stanza:
Some minor spoilers might appear, but I don’t think there’s anything that would a ruin a show for anyone.
Internals were positive, with volume slightly heavier. Advances/declines were 3 to 1 on the NYSE and 14 to 5 on the Nasdaq, with up/down volume 3 to 1 on the NYSE and 5 to 1 on the Nasdaq. New highs/lows were 137/14 on the NYSE and 87/29 on the Nasdaq.
Hugs and Blessings always,
Matthew 3:1-6
Facebook advertising
In 1977 the New York Times reported that there were approximately 2000 surviving masks remaining from this period.
So what does that mean?
The creation of the Salton Sea of today started in 1905, when heavy rainfall and snowmelt caused the Colorado River to swell, overrunning a set of head gates for the Alamo Canal. The resulting flood poured down the canal and breached an Imperial Valley dike. Over a period of approximately two years this newly created river sporadically carried the entire volume of the Colorado River into the Salton Sink.
Did I mention the food?!?
Steve and I have cleared more of the jungle areas, worked further on the planned gravel area at the side of the house and then went to the garden centre to look for inspiration :)
Now I know it was only in my head
Not a “supernatural” power, just the good old fashion way of simple logic and playing magjong the way normal people would, albeit in a really really pro way. I guess you would already know the users of this style right? That’s everyone without a named ability seeing it is the way you’re supposed to play the game. Users range from Haramura Nodoka to Kajiki Yumi and many more.
Corbett: the people involved lack morals
And a long stem rose
Don't give me love thy neighbour
The questions kept going for two hours, and in justice to Jim Orr, while I fear I found his contributions less interesting and so tended to take fewer notes of them, he came across as both enthusiastic and sincere … just not as interesting or as effective a speaker as the others. He seemed like a very nice guy, but I just don’t think I would have voted for him, while all the others gave me reason to feel they’d be good councillors – though naturally I’d never vote for a Tory, even one as charming as Cameron Rose, I agreed with Owen that he’d make a much more impressive face for his party than David Cameron.
I have fallen into an occasional melancholic euphoria these past few days. I think that’s another way of putting insomnia and the lack of energy into perspective. There is no reason for me to be depressed, and I am not, in case you wonder. Once in a while, I feel the ebbs and flow of internalized emotional roller coaster, and sometimes, it’s for no reason.
Reuben got a hair cut, more like a shave, doesn’t look like a Collie any more. But I know it’s cooler.
u have msgs on twitter from tonite .. e
This was given some elaboration.
I was invited into the tent with the two male bikers. I was so naïve at the time. I crawled inside and Tommy took out a gallon jug of homemade elderberry wine and offered me a glass of it. I suddenly felt very grown up. I started out sipping on that potion and ended up gulping until I collapsed on the dirt floor of the tent. Someone transported me back to my mother and my aunt that night, completely drunk and stinking of wine. My mother was furious. She was upset that someone at the orphanage might get wind of it. She was worried that she or her friends might look bad, and that she could get into some kind of trouble if word got out. I cannot forget that she was never concerned for me.
I cooked up some Rotini.
Coronation Street: Becky’s Final Farewell - WINNER
My back is hurting less. It's in the same spot where I have issues with my spinal inflammation on the lower spine. I'm used to it... but it sucks. Hopefully it'll correct itself soon... until then, trying not to make it more angry.
“If you’re willing to pay a little more money, I can give you two really good seats.”
From my previous post, I was asked what divination techniques do I currently employed and I thought it was going to be a quick and easy answer but I started to write more than what a comment section warranted so I decided to post it here instead.
Love the tangerine explosion (definitely more than a pop!) of colour of Josephine's jacket. Looks fab against her skinny black jeans and booties.
The Tunisia (!) Conference ended with the usual “declarations”, “intentions” and “conclusions”, but without any real action taking place — yet. The ICANN is still independent and located in California. But for how long ?
Meanwhile, the press are gleefully reporting the alleged facts, ignoring the real fact that the Feds are attempting to toss aside a jury verdict, again salivating in anticipation at being given a second chance of tasting young white male blood, whilst ignoring, or actively suppressing, details of thousands upon thousands of other far worse crimes, many clearly hate crimes, for the single reason the accused in those cases are inconveniently non-white.
Perfect Vision - Tongues Out
Beginning with the Reagan Revolution, however, there is much lower annual economic growth overall. Only the top 1% has maintained a growth rate over 1%. The entire top 20% (which includes the top 1%), however, could barely keep up with inflation.
Tommy Dean- 25/6/11
There was a glimmer of hope in the continuing race to save Aquascutum this week as it emerged that exclusive talks were underway to sell the business to Hong Kong based YGM Trading. Unfortunately this doesn't provide much hope for those who were left out of work after the Corby factory was shut. There are separate talks being held to sell that asset. If the brand loses its Made in Britain element, it will be a great shame.
No matter which way your book gets published, there’s a lot of work involved for the author when it comes to marketing. And even then, there’s no guarantee it’ll find a large audience.
alarm that there is an orchestrated
In Resident Alien, a stranded alien seeks refuge in the small town of Patience, USA, where he hides undercover as a semi-retired doctor, masking his appearance using his unique mental abilities. Now known as Dr. Harry Vanderspeigle, all the alien wants is to be left alone until he’s rescued.
Says HDC: "That the City Council is hearing all these bills with almost no notice is very disturbing. That each speaker is only going to have THREE MINUTES to comment on 11 bills is outright appalling."
Here it is, that time of the week for Joan's weekly challenge, and this is my card for this weeks Challenge.
What was your favorite part of your wedding?
Liquid Pearls - silver & white opal
Known for her Scottish time travel and Irish historical romances, Jeanette Baker is an award-winning and bestselling author. A part of our Casablanca Classics line, Catriona is now back in print! Kate Sutherland is visited by the mystical, ghostly Catriona, her deceased ancestor, who transports Kate into the passion and bloodshed of 15th century Scotland. With ties in both the past and the present, Kate must now risk everything to right the wrongs of the past, or lock the door on
O shepherd of Israel, hearken,
Now that I've put this post up, maybe someone could enlighten me on the relationship between the THRILLING titles and the EXCITING ones. For some reason I can't get it straight in my head.
- Buy a book yourself from an online bookstore and have it sent to us.
The strange thing is that Dowell’s doctors concluded his wounds were the result of a .45 calibre bullet, and Williams had been using a .38. Some witnesses claimed a third man was involved in the shooting, but he was never identified (and no, there was no grassy knoll nearby for him to shoot from).
I love her more than I thought I could love an “in law”. She and Rebecca are my sisters and I’m so grateful for them.
I have edited back in, Jean Genie that was missing, and i have also edited in the fals start of Five Years that was also missing.Someone was already dealing with this soundboard, it was mastered pretty loud for my taste but i did not want my remaster to be more quiet than this so they are the same in loudness. But they are different in other things.
Pointing at a big photo frame, my dad once told (not once, everytime), “He is…”, one great ‘personality’ whom we unanimously treat as the very-cause and result for everything, “…Bheemalingeshwara”. No matter how much interest I have in logic, reason and physical science, I could not deny that he is ‘everything’. On understanding some books and lectures I came to know Lord Shiva’s tattvam as a mere science, call it – Khagolam, jyothishyam or life-survival whatever.
“This is big damage for me. We became the center of attention. Our picture was played with. We even found ourselves in the Last Supper.”
13. Doctor Rock 5:15
Edit: Just changed the blog title to reflect the fact that there are ten questions, and that I can in fact count.
Opening your bag, you might be a slightly disappointed about the size of your burger. Said one Yelp user, “They should call the place Little Little Burger. The burgers are tiny.” Pair it with some fries and a soda and you’ll be happy. I know you’re college students, but do you always need to stuff your face to the point that you think you’re going to puke? *
Oh my goodness I am so sorry for being so late with the post this week! I had my son’s parents evening earlier and he did so well we went for pizza to celebrate and then caught up on some TV together – and the post completely slipped my mind – oops! Well I’d better get on with it.
We welcome contributions to this Blog from people with many different points of view and would like to take this opportunity to discuss certain points that have been made, regarding the perceived threats of peregrines, in particular with regard to racing pigeons and local breeding bird populations.
Poor Beyan was trying to explain that she has been dying to GTFO of her parents warlocky, icy ggrasp and that she would have only half ruined his life with her parents as in-laws (as opposed to totally ruining it, which is what ZBOW was thinking). Ultimately, Ben defused the first bomb, but the second clearly shook him.
The stronger the opponent the more self-confident he is, which opens many doors for using his numbers, his strengths and his weaknesses against him. While we have more going for us than we realise, patience and timing is what will determine the level of success. As for success we should not be foolish, arrogant and over-confident, but we have to realise the potential for triumph at the end of it all. There will really be a new SA after all of this, a much better place than we could imagine right now, but first we need to get there. There are most interesting things happening at present and the vibes are building. Unfortunately people are being blinded by the media, by leaders with unrealistic promises, two-faced economists and politicians in general.
In Wellington, Florida, 20-year-old Frantz Leger, was arrested at a mall for wearing droopy jeans.
I generally have an order to my blogs, but I figured Saturday’s blog and the comments it generate made this one next in the series.
Brian Worley has a fabulous blog and was featured on “The Doctors” today with his “Top Cinco” tips – check it out !!!
The weather has been damp, and cloudy, and thundery for days on end. No wonder this little guy is hiding out in a flower:
Much of the rapid success of Draw Something came from word of mouth. The app is tied into Facebook, making it easy for player to find or recruit people to join in. Chatter on social media swelled quickly. People started sharing galleries of standout drawings that had been done in-game. The developers smartly helped create a critical mass of buzz by tapping into their users and the social media they were connected to.
I was hoping that one of my heart punches would make this card easier to make, but not a single one had just the right shape. So I stamped the heart four times and tried cutting it out, but my cutting wasn't very neatly done. I ended up sanding the edges for that nice, warm, fuzzy heart feeling.... or something. It's kind of funny that my sander is heart-shaped, too. Whatever. I'm just going with it.
2nd layer green, wide 6" and high 6" with a circle in the centre wide 1.76" and high 1.76"
Some of the commenters also suggest that old folks be press-ganged into working for their social security by 'working in inner-city schools.' What, is that another approach to the 'death panels?' Sounds like it to me. What have old folks done to be consigned to that fate?
Corner die: Whimsy
I guess I’ve just been spoiled all my life by clothing stores in America that have changing rooms where I can take items that strike my fancy and try them on without any hassle. I’ve also been spoiled by being able to drive myself to and from the malls when the urge strikes me and not have to bother my husband - who hates to shop and hates to drive - to take me. I’ve also been accustomed to stores in the US which are generally open from 9am til 9pm or longer. And I’ve also been spoiled by the liberal return policies of most businesses in America that normally allow at least a 30 to 60 day grace period in which to return an item that I was able to try on there at the store before I bought it, but then later decided I wasn’t really that crazy about in the first place.
“Ha, we all need this easy money. Still don’t get why Sal needs it.”
My internal dialog runs the gamut of Holy shit did you really just say that? If I just lost 5 pounds…This writing is total crap! My hair looks like a squirrel died on my head. I can’t believe I smell this way…
So you will need, 200g of Ginger Nut biscuits, 50g Unsalted Butter, 2 x 250g pots of Mascarpone Cheese, 50g Icing Sugar, 2 Limes and a little bit of plain chocolate. That’s it.
Diane Lane stars as an FBI cyber crimes guru who is after a serial killer who captures people to put them in eventually fatal torture devices as part of a regular web show. The gimmick is the more people who click on his website to watch the murders, the faster the victims are killed. His message is that we are all accessories to murder. If no one watched, the victims would not die.
With this in mind, we constantly pray for you, that our God may count you worthy of his calling, and that by his power he may fulfill every good purpose of yours and every act prompted by your faith. We pray this so that the name of our Lord Jesus may be glorified in you, and you in him, according to the grace of our God and the Lord Jesus Christ.
Just a quick post today....
This was in the days before lamaze, birthing rooms, and daddies wearing cups, and sliding down the wall in a faint, as their wives delivered their children beside them........
The swivel-eyed professor of nowt has, of course, gone ballistic.
“One of our clowns claims that you put a curse on him. As the doctor has discovered no physical ailment, it appears that the clown’s belief in your malevolent powers is the cause of his symptoms. I should therefore be obliged if you would inform him that his fears are groundless.”
When: Saturday 12th November @ 3.00 PM
The message of Lehrer’s book is that creativity is not a super power. Anyone can be creative — it just takes hard work.
Mustard Vinaigrette
4) Grease a mini cup cake mould or line them with baking cups.
When you don't know a setting, the details don't matter. But when you do - they matter more than you realise.
Last weekend, I had the pleasure of collaborating on a creative photo shoot with Laura Winslow Photography. I was asked to style an Alice in Wonderland tablescape and surroundings. Giddy with excitement, I rolled out of bed at 4:15am to load up the car and head to the shoot. It was held at the estate of a well known family in our area. It couldn't have been more gorgeous! What an experience! The entire shoot went off without a glitch, thanks to Laura's organization and fabulous attitude. The girls (and one boy!) showed off gorgeous clothing and accessories. The flowers and baked goods topped off the table perfectly!
- Like a museum, admission is free after 5pm on the third Tuesday of each month
I came across a square tower with large arches on every floor. I could see the staircase winding up inside, and I wondered, are tourists allowed up. I checked - locked. But, a friend has told me where to go for a view. I'll try it today.
So maybe those will come sooner rather than later?
In closing, I am now sitting at the patio table on my backyard deck nursing my fifth Landshark Lager. The four empties are standing guard along the rail as I look out at my fine collection of weeds sprouting from my much-abused lawn. It is my sincere hope that things begin to unwind around here and become less complicated. If not, at some point I can feel a road trip down to Cocoa Beach, Florida coming on and once I get down there I am sure the siren of call of Key West might become overwhelming.
15. OPI Black Cherry Chutney (2)
We at Dolores Delargo Towers salute a magnificent style icon! RIP.
According to an article in London’s Guardian newspaper, Michael Gove is responding to complaints that first came from PinkNews.co.uk, a British LGBT news source, concerning the Catholic Education Service’s (CES) distribution to high school students of a petition against marriage equality organized by the “Coalition for Marriage.”
Healthier: The week started with a party and ended with a party. The parties that I throw have food...yummy food that I would not normally make. And, of course, a scrumptious dessert. Two desserts in one week (I do not normally eat dessert). I still stayed within my calorie count for the week, but the food that I chose to eat this week was not the best. So while I am doing excellent on how much I put in my mouth, I need to now concentrate more on what I am putting in my mouth.
My date is late.
Book Fair Bewares: There are many reasons for writers to attend book fairs. Unfortunately, there are just as many ways for unscrupulous people to take advantage of that.
As he serves a customer a Manhattan, a piece of parsley falls into the drink.
This country is so disenfranchised it is unbelievable. Of course the politicians don’t care as long as some bunch or saps vote them in so they can claim for duck houses, moats, sister’s bedroom or vomitarium.
“Zeph? Zephyr? How could it be? That was me on the right and… Zeph was… she was… Zeph, my Zeph…”
I know my mom will be fine. But she's my mom and I don't like seeing her hurt in any way. I will say this, if my Aunt Carol had not been there with my mom day in and day out, I don't know how we would have made it. It was not possible for me to be at the hospital all the time. But my Aunt was there during the most critical times and it put my heart and mind at ease knowing she was there and that my mom was safe and being taken care of. Thank you so much and I love you Aunt Carol! You were my mom's angel the last few weeks!
Since my senior year in high school, I have been interested in technology and different cultures, and where the crossover for these two topics lies. As a German immigrant, as well as a somewhat tech-savvy student in high school, these areas were naturally my field of interest. An interesting cross-over I found between the two is this issue: We can examinehttp://www.honda.com.au/cars.aspx, http://www.honda.co.jp/auto/, http://www.honda.com.cn/, http://www.honda.ca/automotive, http://automobiles.honda.com/, http://www.honda.de/, http://www.honda.fr/car/, and http://www.honda.co.ru/cars/cars.shtml , all of which are, essentially, the same home page for the same company. Why, though, are they all different? Wouldn’t it simply suffice to just translate the text and have all the non-literary items be exactly the same? These thoughts developed into a broader question of, “What are the cultural differences (besides language) found online, and how are they changing?” After all, a red background on a page might mean good fortune in China, whereas it signifies aggression and politics in the United States.
“When problems arise in my life, I know I need to work on my art.” – I think Julia Cameron said that.
If she can afford it maybe she’ll give you more money towards the dress, but if she can’t, thank her graciously and pay the balance without telling her.
Anyhow, speaking of R, it is quite scary/sad to be doing the long distance thing. I can still come back home to Sydney at least once every other week and for holidays, but when I think about how it is going to be like that for 5 years it is rather intimidating. However if we can't make it through this, then we might as well give up now. Which is clearly not an option. I am unbelievably lucky to have him in my life, to have him believe in me unfailingly and support me without question through anything and everything. Do your best, forget the rest. That's all we can hope for.
Now, she thought—like thirty years ago—this clean blue place is still their Eden.
Though they look too worn
Chatty:
Remove banana and throw it away.
How often do you twirl on a goddamn beach in a white dress while suffering from cramps that make you want to pull your uterus out of your body without the aide of anesthetic?
"* # Enter the R-2 Prime Cup's Master Ball division (you have to beat the first three divisions first).
As it turned out the shark’s name was Leonard. Once he had finished devouring Mark he felt bad about eating the poor guy. So he went to a wise octopus and asked what he could do. The octopus sent him on a quest to scalp an elf, but first he had to visit some sea gnomes to make him a supershark suit so that he could walk on land. (My sister is now reminding me that apparently I had to come up with a reason why elves and gnomes are different. What I ended up telling her was that elves lived on land and gnomes lived underwater. makes sense…) So after acquiring his supersuit, Leonard set off, but was thrown off by a storm and ended up in China. While there he met a llama named Ferdinand and they decided to walk together to Ireland to find some elves. And then they were chased by a Chinese mob. And then they ran into the Great Wall of China. And then Leonard accidentally broke a hole in the Wall. And then a bunch of mythical Chinese women who had been holding up the Wall since it was built came out. And the women got into a fight with the Chinese mob.
Until Next Time~~~~Travel Safely
Remember during the show when everybody was promoting their fan vote, and I wasn't? Well, obviously you know why now. But I'm calling in that favor - if you get a chance, and feel like it let HGTV know what you think about Secrets From a Stylist. Viewer feedback is super important to them. Click here, to comment to HGTV.
There have been many bills that have come before me. Currently in legislation is the Violence Against Women’s Act and Congresswoman Moore of Wisconsin, District Four can be seen on the House floor sharing openly that she was molested by a family member at a young age, and raped as a teenager.
salt, pepper, and seasoned salt to taste
It was the Auditor General’s report, not Pakatan Rakyat politicians who first highlighted this issue, calling the project a mess. Read more here.
Helpful Hint
Gordon Matta-Clark (1 silver dye bleach print and 1 film, 1974, 1978)
Heart Doodles embossing Folder (The paper studio)
It is unclear how, but the Governor expects this group to be more interested in the educational needs of children than “the priorities of the financial interests.” Cuomo also named Randi Weingarten to the panel with no response from the President of the American Federation of Teachers.
However, that hope would be dashed. State Senator Kevin Leon recently introduced legislation that would require every hotel in the state of California to use fitted sheets in their hotel rooms rather than regular sheets that get tucked under the mattress by the maids of California. His intent of the legislation was to make life easier and safer for the maids since he felt the maids would not have to lift as many mattresses when the make up the hotel rooms.
the Obama administration?
Mom had chosen that day of all days to make the elaborate preparations required for bisi bele bhaat, and was watching the utensils in the kitchen shake as she turned off the gas and yelled. Dad had just taken his morning shower and was hanging his clothes on the clothesline to dry, wondering whether his BP had shot up, as the earth below him was shaking. My grandpa, who was hard of hearing, was bathing, bathroom door locked, the geezer on and the hot water running.
korean designer daisung kim has sent us images of his new design '24K pencil'.
I wish we could suspend paychecks for US Senators Actors Studio’s James Lipton Gives Mitt Romney Advice on Being Human White Supremacy Defended By Former National Review Writer A Peephole View of How the Koch Brothers Do Their Dirty Work – This Time Wisconsin Winston Churchill’s Message to the US Congress :)
All of the treats will be delivered tomorrow, except for the birthday cupcake, which was delivered today. I sure hope we earn some brownie points. HA! Brownie points! Get it? Yes, I'm a dork.
Why would you cover your ears with a helmet and drown out the serenade of birds on a relaxing stretch of river? Would it make sense to over-paddle rivulets of water when they already submit to the gentle tug of downstream flows?
Clipart has taken on a whole new art form in recent years. The world of
4. In my younger and more vulnerable years my father gave me some advice that I’ve been turning over in my mind ever since.
I remember telling some adult would-be children's writers that yes, we do get smaller advances than adults, but that's ok because we have another revenue stream; school visits. Well it looks like that one just dried up.
According to official statistics, Myanmar-Vietnam bilateral trade amounted to 121.8 million U.S dollars in the first three quarters of 2011, an increase of 6.2 percent compared with the same period of 2010.
Just as I imagined....this week threw me for a huge loop! I started back to work after about 14 weeks on maternity leave. Wowzer! It's gone more smooth than I imagined as far as emotionally (thank you, Lord, for answered prayers!) However, my body has felt it for sure! My diet has been messed up...quick lunches...quick, easy dinners. I only worked out once this work week, I am sleep-deprived, and my stress level is up with all the new demands.
So, here's the deal. Mrs MP thinks I should go mobile. This would involve me buying a laptop and I do not have the money to do that. Therefore, I am launching this special appeal.
Doesn't seem balanced does it? You know where my priorities are don't you?
I am not where I want to be with my campaign. While some things have improved, there is a glaring omission in 2012 that was a big part of my 2008 campaign. I am of course talking about the celebrity endorsements. It has been a long time since a celebrity has stepped up and endorsed me.
Caller: Er . . . Mexico?
The adventure revolves around the search for the remains of a character's father, who disappeared and therefore could not be buried by his sons, dishonoring them. At the time of his disappearance the father was equipped with a family heirloom, a spear blessed by Wotan and Thurnor, that would never break in battle and added +1 to it's wielder's spear skill. A traveler will relate a tale in which the heirloom appears, drawing the character into a confrontation with its new owner and providing him with a clue as to the whereabouts of his father's remains. If no player character is appropriate, then an NPC thegn, Caedwalla, will be the heir and will ask the assistance of the player characters in the recovering of the artifact. The rest of the scenario is written presuming it is this NPC who is the heir.
Bake for 50 minutes or until a skewer inserted comes out clean. Serve warm with cream or ice-cream for extra indulgence or simply on its own with a good cuppa.
The entomology group at Wageningen University is a passionate advocate of the use of edible insects and farming insects for industrial use. They are working on foodstuffs where the protein is coming from insect sources. They are definitely gaining momentum and are currently appearing on TV in different countries; ‘the Dutch are eating insects’. Not quite yet, but a group of people, including some insect food entrepreneurs/farmers is certainly busy paving the way for more acceptance of this idea (see this item). In their reasoning on why we should start eating insects, we can clearly recognise the functionalist view on food taboo. Functionalists explain taboos in terms of their utility. The taboo is there to promote sustainable or efficient resource utilization by for example excluding husbandry of species that are destructive or uneconomical. So far it has been uneconomical to farm insects which are not as big and numerous in moderate climates as in the tropics where they are used as food.
I moved out of my adoptive home and lived with roommates and took a series of jobs. I continued to seek therapy but, except for the comfort I got from discussing adoption matters with other adoptees and searching for my birthparents (only to be cruelly rejected by my birthmother, which put me into a tailspin) I didn’t find that much help. I eventually ended up getting on a career path by getting my Master’s Degree at a CIty University but I had much anxiety all the way through the program.
— Secretary of State Madeleine Albright to Colin Powell (chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff) in the 1990s, about Bosnia, from Madam Secretary (2003), p. 182
WITBANK: Veronica Edwards (30) fights back bravely against racist attacker in her home who called her “white bitch”.
Had some good and not-so-good beers lately, and thought I'd put them all up together.
A prodigy despite his inability to see printed music, he studied classical music for several years before deciding to “test the water on my own” instead of pursuing additional studies at a university. Shearing began his career at a London pub when he was 16.
Crochet Pattern Central has many free patterns you can browse through to get patterns for many different types of pets! Crochet For Pets
Climbing trees.
Galloway’s win came because “The Respect Party” is code for The MUSLIM Party. The European precedent has now been set for a thumping win by such a party, and it will be the first of many. Mark my words.
"What was that?!" asked Ghibelline the elf. He had backed away when the cleric entered the cell and remained unnoticed while she cast her healing prayer over Edouard.
But, then the cage exploded.
408: Number Of Regulations Proposed By Obama During First Two Years That Have An Economic Impact Of Over $100 Million. ( Competitive Enterprise Institute , 2011)
Now to show something besides a vision in your mind of me doing jazzercise. It's really fun and since I am not self conscience about how I look around all the young hotties I had fun. (loved it)
Yo ho, Here's a tale
7. The Black Book of Communism, p.510.
Riddle Question: Why is Alabama the smartest state in the U.S.A.?
The Accidental Tourist
1. Ancient TV
It gets to people.
I'll be reading some from their list in the near future....How about you? What books have you read that you would put on the list of greatest books ever written?
Melt 2 tablespoons of butter (or 1 tablespoon each of butter and lemon curd) and spread it over the edges of the crust and the top of the fruit with a pastry brush or the back of a spoon. Sprinkle 2 tablespoons of sugar over the crust if you wanna make it extra pretty.
I am proud of myself: finished the proposal and sent it off. Busy little beav as long as I don’t have to leave the couch.
2 zucchini
From Small Things (Big Things One Day Come)
Win at any cost. That’s always been the mantra of sports agent Liz Darnell. When she carries things too far and risks losing her number-one client, baseball pro Gavin Riley, Liz realizes that she’ll have to work extra innings to win him back. It might not be too much of a stretch. She’s had a thing for this player’s moves since she first laid eyes on him, and by the looks of it, he wants her just as bad.
Things like peas and carrots find their spiritual home on stamps I think! Suddenly, they are as sweet as they sound....
Yellow cake, strawberry jam, and peanut butter garnish
The shift to the new consciousness certainly is not for the faint of heart! This book can help those who are ready to take on the challenge!
In theory the idea sounds good. You take in a needy refugee rather than a student. In reality the idea is close to ridiculous. Students come because they want to learn the language. They want to study. Their home lives are, generally speaking, relatively stable. They usually come from well-off families. While some of their customs, dietary requirements and so on are different they are also sufficiently similar for adjustments to be made. They will, on the whole, be accommodating. It is why they are here. Most know it is a temporary experience.
As I mentioned in a previous post, weekend sex is the only type of sex that I can now have. And the three times I have had sex since I have been back from the field is a record for the past month.
After all, injuries wasteland this type of large bookbag in an attempt to rainwater.
And who got Mollie Makes this month? I love that mag, I really do. Lifestyles mag look so good on the coffee table but there are not enough meaty projects in there for me (and you know I like my meat, right?!). Well, anyway........I wanted to use the cardboard packaging from the free buttons of this months issue.
The 30x30x30 is a reunion with the artistic endeavor. It is a gift to the children from “Treetops Montessori School”. Finally, it is a courageous and innovative way to make artistic calls.
So why do I love Guatemala? What follows is my top five reasons I love Guatemala and think it is a great travel destination and even more so an amazing place to live.
III. Avoidance: The Preemptive Strike.
I've got another book from Kalmach that I'm smitten with. It's Jewelry for the New Romantic. Here's an interview with the book's author Nealay Patel.
10. Her house
A committee is currently working on putting together a cookbook for a fundraiser and you’re going to want to get one, because no one can ever have too many cookbooks. Ask me, I know. If you’d like to know more or be a part of it, send an email to info@bethlehemfood.coop
I drove back to Texas on Saturday, 12 hours straight, luckily not that much traffic. I would like to kindly request that the Oklahoma Turnpike Authority please either man the toll booths on the Creek Tollway around Tulsa or have it so that the fucking change machines WORK! I mean, seriously, I would pay the tolls if you made it possible for me to, but with toll booths that are exact change only, me not having change and you guys not having change machines that work...what the hell am I supposed to do? Yeah, I had to run the toll booth. I've never done that before. HOWEVER..... I did pay for the one I had to run at the next opportunity, where there was actually a person available. I am evil, but not a thief.
5-6-11 Finished it in the car on the way to Pizza Hut! I sewed in the ends on the way home!
I didn't want to post this article publicly. I have been pretty much in a "zen" place, posting the in-depth articles about China's international adoption program to my subscription blog. I have known about the issues discussed in this article for a while, but felt that families wanting to know more could subscribe to our blog. This kept the "blow back" from waiting families and others at a minimum, since subscription blog readers are composed of families who have deep experience in China's program, and could accept the stories and discoveries without too much emotional anxiety.
- mixed all ingredients together making batter, add more cold sparkling water if its doughy. The batter should be runny but still stick to a spoon.
Did one of the wires services run a story on the trivia that reporters picked up?
Of course, it all works out in the end. Well, at least...until tomorrow.
The way I do it is - I go fuzzy - I want to blur the boundary between your nervous system and mine. And then - I want to to be really, really curious about what's going to happen next. So I go curious and I go fuzzy-fuzzy ... I want my point of concentration, where my mind is, to be in there, about where your centre is. Now, I'm guessing that what happens is, people dance like it makes sense to dance in classes, which mostly isn't like that.
That said based on the descriptors used by my fellow Daring Cooks - luscious, refreshing and delicious - I will be looking further into cooking with tea. Especially as tea is a great way to add
obviously good looking in orange:
Height and cross section in this area is critical as teams want a minimal cross section in between the front wheels and as much space underneath to fit bodywork to direct airflow to around and under the sidepods. So teams will tend to raise these bulkheads as high as they can go.
Mix together the beef, onion, parsley and salt.
While cutting training programs may seem like a good way to save money, Rick Dacri of human resources consulting firm Dacri & Associates in Kennebunkport warns against doing so without thoroughly considering the consequences.
If kids not interested or stuck in one place, give them a break, come back later
In August 1942, he enlisted in the Marine Corps. He attended boot camp at Marine Corps Recruit Depot San Diego and then attended Officer's Candidate School at Marine Corps Base Quantico, where he was commissioned a Second Lieutenant on June 2, 1943. Because he had already logged 180 solo hours as a pilot prior to enlisting in the Marine Corps, Tyrone Power was able to go through a short, intense flight training program at Naval Air Station Corpus Christi, Texas, where he earned his wings and was promoted to First Lieutenant. Power arrived at Marine Corps Air Station Cherry Point, North Carolina in July, 1944 and was assigned to VMR-352 as an R5C transport copilot. The squadron moved to Marine Corps Air Station El Toro in California in October 1944. Power was reassigned to VMR-353 and joined them on Kwajalein in February 1945. He flew cargo in to and wounded Marines out during the Battle of Iwo Jima and the Battle of Okinawa.
you held: pans, scissors, my hands,
4 cups rhubarb
24 hours ago, we were sharing a bottle of sauv blanc at Park Tavern. Jeannie uncharacteristically ordered a cheeseburger and fries and me, sushi. After dinner, wanting to be first in line when they opened the doors at Variety Playhouse for the concert we were going to, we hailed a cab with Walter Kirkland, best darn cab driver in the ATL.
This forced me to defend myself for the past 8 months on this blog.
Ah, to be 8 again.....
Think. Please. You can change an industry in 140 characters or less.
Recept: Yes, I have.
Thomas Lessmann, 51, was too overweight to be scanned with normal machinery at a hospital. But the thought of being X-rayed on a giant machine at Hamburg Zoo too humiliating.
He'll direct incoming traffic to the proper locations
lot of them partials upgraded to fulls. Even had one agent tell me my opening chapter was one of the best she'd ever received. (I don't say this in a cocky way at all, I'm only trying to convey how hard it is to have your hopes so high only to fall and have them dashed) So each time I thought, "This will be
I started last night's workout whiny-exhausted.
Peter Black's opposition to constitutional change for Wales, other than the wholesale changes imposed by the ConDems, is, in reality, an opposition to Wales having a better economic, social and ethical future based on a an alternative constitution to that offered by the corrupt UKanian State that he supports.
when I broke down today and gave it a whirl I tried it
My friend, Jen, dresses her entire family in a particular theme each Mardi Gras and was sweet enough to include Luz and James in the choice for 2012, Super Saints. They were both thrilled when they saw their Super Saint t's and James would probably wear his every day if I allowed it.
1.Yuriorkis Gamboa vs Juan Manuel Lopez
7) When cake is done, remove from oven and let cool in pan for 30 minutes. Invert cake onto a rack and let cool completely, right side up, for an hour, brushing the pound cake with the syrup every 5 minutes.
John Edgar Heever
Last night, I took my eldest and her friend to a local business park and we took some photos with my new Nikon. I've been wanting to do this since I got it, but the timing or the weather just hasn't been cooperative.
I love small town festivals. You can't walk 10 feet without running into an old friend that you haven't seen in ages. The smell of BBQ, and the sound of people laughing.
Sell it, or give it away. You don’t own things, thing own you. Period. Keep the practical and necessary and if you want, allow for arts and family and fun stuff and all. You decide. But follow your conscience. Read up on feng shui, you’ll get your mind blown on “stuff” from an angle that may help you.
It’s not long before I reach a line of wide-crowned hornbeams, clearly of considerable age, their stout trunks encrusted with grey-green lichens, atop a long linear bank. This earthwork is Park Pale, at least 700 years old, and originally constructed to enclose the medieval deer park of Lyndhurst Old Park. I decide to follow its alignment, and continue along the bottom of the associated ditch, shushing through the deep leaf litter.
So..via text messaging last night (he was gone all yesterday) he let me know that he is working on my list of *simple guidelines.*
The ending of the movie was pretty spectacular, full of historical facts, supernatural terrors, and nail in scrotum payback. But Starkwell and Lovelock didn’t really react at all. They said they were waiting to see if there would be another shot of him waking up, all sweaty, thinking “thank goodness, it was only a dream.” It never came. Good news for Haiti, but bad news for his scrotum.
Here's Isaac showing off his new jammies! My mom has always given me one gift on Christmas Eve, new pajamas. As our family has grown, she's maintained that tradition for all of us. This year, she made us all pajama pants with t-shirts. Isaac's were UK, of course!
moment to lung.
MSPs rejected Ms Macdonald's last attempt to legalise physician-assisted suicide and euthanasia in Scotland recognizing that such a move would seriously endanger public safety. Instead they sent a ringing endorsement to making the very best palliative care widely available and accessible.
be a help to those who need him and on guard against
I have a confession to make: I have a hard time making up my mind. At times, I am overcome by indecision. To be more specific, I can’t figure out which department of the federal government should be shut down first.
Today was my first day of school at Central City High, and I loved it. I rose at 5:30a.m., showered, and ate a bowl of Cocoa Puffs. When I first got up, though, I drank an entire cup of cranberry juice, which I’ll be sure not to do again s it caused my stomach considerable distress. We have six, no, seven periods here, a big change from Beautiful Town, where we had only five. The classes were really short, only about fifty minutes each. I’d only just become acclimated to one when another would begin!
13 Alessandro Alessandroni - Cop's Blood
I actually don't have an account with either. I never got on either of those bandwagons. And yes I know I am missing out, but I barely have time to keep up with my blog, school, social life, school, family, oh and school!
They walk among us
The beach is only 4 weeks away and I really want to be able to fit into my swimsuit. Are any of you getting ready for the beach? How are you preparing to fit into your swimsuit? Or am I the only crazy one that bought a swimsuit one size too small? ;)
Do make this town to be preferred above the rest.
One day when I was in high school I started doodling and suddenly I had created something like this. At one time I designed a back tattoo piece that would run from the back of my neck to my tail bone which had meaning to me, every line and stroke was an emotion, a part of the journey. I put it in a safe place and never saw it again. Once I realised I couldn’t find it, or more that it may have been removed from my room, I quit doodling. I think I quit writing around the same time. I started drawing again only recently. It probably doesn’t mean much to anyone but, you know, it’s a thing I do.
Therapeutic Actions: (see the glossary for further explanation of these unusual words) Anti-depressant, antiseptic, aphrodisiac, anti-spasmodic, cicatrisant, expectorant, galactagogue, parturient, sedative and uterine.
Step 1: Wait for the pizza materials. Wait some more. Steal some wheels from the bakery and run away before anyone notices you’re taking them. Wait a little longer. Stare in awe at the new wrapper that will shortly be covered in melted cheese.
Aww, its not so happy for you? Sorry....I am not a fan of Mondays either.
Another friend of mine online lost a child a few months ago. Their daughter was born at 24 weeks, and lived for 3 days. This was their second loss due to preterm labor. They asked people to do a good deed this year in their children's memory, then send them a Christmas card about it, so that on Christmas morning they can open those cards so it will bring them a little joy this holiday. I think it's a wonderful idea, and I can only hope it brings them some comfort.
Warners Bros started the series with high hopes and the first three are definitely 8-reel A-pictures with first-rate directors and casts – after that the returns must have been a little disappointing though as they clearly got downgraded to B-movies. Running times got cut down by about 15 minutes each to last about an hour on the second half of the double bill. The first four starring Warren William as Mason are definitely the cream of the crop, climaxing with Perry and Della actually getting married! This was reversed after William left with Della single again opposite as played by Ricardo Cortez first and then Donald Woods, who in Curious Bride had played the weasel second husband of Rhoda.
31 TO 40 POINTS
The sky darkened once more and the black specks resumed falling as the voice boomed, "Answer!"
They also didn't know what to do about various derelict buildings all around East Berlin in the days when it was becoming evident that the government was about to fall. Communists are great when it comes to drawing up plans, less so about executing them. A list of old buildings scheduled for demolition was prepared, but there was a serious shortage of workers to actually perform the demolition. Immediately after the Wall opened, a photocopy of the list was circulated among people looking to squat East Berlin, and a number of prominent squats -- Eimer on Rosenthaler Str., the Italian art-junkies on Auguststr., the complex on Castanienallee -- were the result. But Tacheles was the first, inhabited by people who styled themselves artists. Who knows, they may actually have been artists at first. But by the time I caught up with Tacheles, it was just another squat, albeit one which loudly proclaimed itself for artists.
Note: If you are feeling a tightness in the outer right thigh already, stay here. Otherwise, adjust your right foot to be as close to parallel with your right knee as possible.
( 5 )
This is based on the average of 16 grams or one-fourth cup of rice wasted by each person per day. This accounts for about 1,200 metric tons of wasted rice per day conservatively valued at 14.4 million Pesos per day, according to Food and Nutrition Research Institute of the Department and Science and Technology (FNRI-DOST).
The stripper, one Crystal Gail Mangum, eventually admitted she was no longer sure whether anyone had had sex with her, but by then the boys had been kicked out of college and their reputations destroyed. Why does the MSM ignore the thousands of black-on-white rapes and jump aboard a clearly tenuous white-on-black case with such a frenzy? What sort of sickness now infects the liberal West?
Tania is also a graphic designer and has a gorgeous range of screen printed cards for her shop.
walking down the strip somewhere in time
This is a winning game plan for NOT revising a novel.
So in my youthful adolescence, I’ve been diagnosed with arthritic knees, and I’ve been told in no uncertain terms that I am not allowed to run long distances.
Today my shots were determined at 6:45 am whilst I was lying in bed cursing the fact that my body clock tells me to wake up at 6:30am everyday regardless of whether I have work or not. I hadn’t even gone outside by that point, but I could tell from the pinkish glow at my window that the sunrise was pretty and the chill in the air hinted at a frost. I was right. Armed with the camera and shivering in my pyjamas I sat on the concrete pathway outside the patio doors and began shooting.
Experienced and enthusiastic, I have a real passion for photography that I have gained over the years and that shines through in my pictures and my portfolio. I specialise in capturing those spontaneous moments that we otherwise could lose, either at your wedding or on a relaxed family shoot of your choice. I am always happy to talk about photography, so if you think I might be the right person to take your photographs then give me a ring to discuss your pictures, they are yours after all.
While the cashew milk looks thick and creamy, it is light and thin on the tongue like skim milk.
with meaning and clarity.
And God doesn’t send us anything but his Word. And what is His Word to us: I will make these dry bones live. Preach, son of man. “So I prophesied as I was commanded. That’s all. He just spoke aloud with ordinary words. No magic. No secret incantations. No conjuring tricks with bones. Just the living power of the word of the living God invading the valley of the shadow of death.” (Wright, 306)
You are required to do study on things like what amount of competition will come up, whether the market is saturated or not, what do consumers of this market look into, etc. Knowing the environment in which you think your business and you will be functioning, will be helpful in equipping your business with necessary tools that are required to make online business success.
Vanessa was diagnosed when she was only 25 years old. Yes, young women get breast cancer. That’s a point The SCAR Project is out to make. The stats are out there for anyone to clearly see, but everyone knows a picture is worth a 1000 words.
Even more surprising is the compelling presence of local doctor Brandon "Yale, and Chelsea soon finds her "short stay" has stretched into the entire summer. She cannot put this cottage and her family's past behind her easily—and the more she learns about the woman her grandmother truly was, the more Chelsea's own life begins to change . . . and nothing will ever be the same again.
“Susan has impeccable integrity, what a great individual. Thank you for a wonderful transaction.”
It brings me freedom
(I didn't want to be too hard, so I balanced the criticism with a compliment. I'd read the article. I know this happens on Twitter. I know it's social scientists doing what they do, so okay. Another social scientist will have a theory on it and have his or her stacks of evidence and analysis to justify their conclusion(s) too. The author wrote about it. In the article he acknowledged that this wasn't a complete picture of black activity on Twitter and, for that, I say good job. I have no interest in broadening my frustration with the image a critique of his writing. That crosses to bitching because you just want to keep bitching. It's the image I've got issues with.)
end product ahead of the process, that values only the future
"That's better. When I return you will be allowed to remove the plug and empty your bowels. We will repeat this process 3 times just to be sure you're good and clean. Then, do you know what will happen to you, my little tramp?"
Writing an oral history isn’t easy. Taylor and McNeil didn’t just dump a bunch of quotes onto the page and slap a cover on it. This isn’t an exercise in transcription. Transcription is only the first step. The job of a narrative historian is to write history by metabolizing existing information, paraphrasing and selecting quotations, and telling the story in his or her own words. The job of the oral historian is to shape the exact words of others into a story, by interviewing innumerable sources, then cutting, refining, editing, grouping and sequencing quotations into a tightly curated composite that forms a larger portrait. That’s a different challenge than the traditional narrative author’s job, but no less of a chore.
- I measured out 100g for each bun, and ended up with 20 1/2. If I'd been a little more thoughtful when I was working, I could have avoided that half roll, but warm from the oven the little bun made for a great taste test for my daughter.
Mugabe has now been sworn in for a sixth term as Zimbabwe's president, a process which Tsvangirai described as "a complete joke". More than 130,000 voters spoiled their ballot papers in the election.
Studies conducted by Brownell, Svetlova, and Nichols (2009) have suggested that at 25 months of age, children are more likely to share if the recipient is vocal rather than silent (p.123). For example: If an adult sits at a table with a toddler who has a plate full of snacks and the adult vocally expresses “I like cookies!” then the chances are that he will recognize the adult’s needs and desires and will share the cookie with the adult. However if an adult (or a child) is silent, then the chances of the toddler sharing are lower.
Comprised of Chris Preece (vocals), Evan Pharmakis (guitar, vocals), Shawn Marquis (bass), Nick Lambert (guitar) and newcomer Chris Campbell (drums), Vanna have over four years of touring and recording under their belts now, and have stepped into the studio with a remarkably developed sound for the group’s sophomore effort.
Thank you for always knowing when I need a hug. Or a kick in the ass.
Some more croaking ensued about what to do when the muscles spasm so badly it cuts off my airway. I explained my clear preference was to hide at home avoiding hospital at all costs. Dr Breathe conceded he didn't have a better plan. There is no medication or surgery which can treat this problem apart from antibiotics for acute infections. The only possible source of help and improvement is specialist Speech and Language Therapy (SALT). I've been on the waiting list for that specialist intervention since Christmas, and without normal speech since October. Had I been in work say as a teacher or call centre worker and had to sign off sick after a week or so of this new problem I would now be six months into my twelve months time limit for contributory ESA, with no real sign of when treatment might be. Dr Breathe did say we could if I wanted try various inhalers but that he didn't think they would make any difference. Neither do I, and as I don't require the only difference they might make, which is the psychological semblence of having some control over the situation we both decided not to bother and Dr Breathe said he'd chase up SALT. Again. SALT was under funded during the New Labour years and not subject to the same kind of targets as being seen by a consultant, so although it's the only potential source of help for me the waiting list is indefinite.
Enter the dark, magical world of the House of Night, a world very much like our own, except here vampyres have always existed.
I granted her that much. “How many llamatologists are there?”
“Yeah, Daddy,” she went on. “Money is nice but I’d rather have you.”
In the name of "I guess that's just life"
I also finished off the 3D cottage, yay! That was a real pig to stitch together, the stitched pieces are wrapped around plastic canvas to make them rigid and I now have a hole in my finger end off pushing the needle through the plastic too many times! However it does look good and I'm happy with it as well as happy to be finally finished! So a ta-da moment.......
And I’ll hope Cetaphil gets with the program and removes the parabens and sulfates, as a lot of other beauty products have followed suit too.
But she didn’t show
Why Do People Use the Internet to Buy Watches?
There are different levels of participation. I plan to go for the Sorcerer's Class which requires me to read and review 3 -5 books during March. The books I plan to read are:
I'm not Catholic, but I always experience a Catholic amount of guilt when things are going my way.
My mom is driving here from Mihhihhippi tomorrow for a reasonably lengthy stay. I am quite sure that she will do something at some point that makes me want to bang my head against the wall in frustration. Really, isn't that what parents are for? With that in mind, it's time to list the things that are really cool about my mom, so I can refer to them when I am going insane.
To: walsh.david26@yahoo.com
The correct dise?o paginas web serves well in achieving many other objectives like search engine optimization, content management and animation. Professionals can think up designs based on the client’s objectives and requirements and then develop the design into a functional system.
I have heard about some of the things going on down in the Hive which I don't like at all. Especially dealing with rec, which is what I used to do. In my mind, it's going to get someone off in a wreck and possibly hurt if they are not extremely careful.
Barryn's reason for visiting the Palace would have been the architecture with its influence of Ottoman, Georgia, Persian and Armenian styles. At this time he had not long completed his degree in Architecture. The second photo was taken in the Palace court yard, everywhere he travelled he sent back photos that he thought might inspire me for embroidery designs, if only I had the time to stitch them all. This one however did get me excited. the wonderful tree of life with a large sunflower at the top carved in stone This was on a small building in the Palace courtyard.
PALERMOS SPINACH AND GOAT CHEESE PIZZA
a meadow of delight.
“Best Buy’s customers and employees around the world represent a variety of faiths and denominations. We respect that diversity, and choose to engage with our customers, employees and communities in ways that reflect their traditions and maintain good relationships for Best Buy,” its online statement reads.
Jo Fletcher – Dead Di And The Zombie King
I don't know if you saw Taylor's sweet post on Friday where she shared a wonderful announcement that she and her husband Jon were pregnant and expecting their first child in September this year!! Woo-Hoo!! The whole Baker's Dozen Design Team is so excited for Taylor and Jon and we all can't wait to meet the new little cupcake!!!
Yesterday evening however, he decided it was unfair that he was the only cat with a curfew and shot out the door when the Sock Dropper finally gave in to my demands that he take the rubbish out.
There are a lot of new simple living blogs now, just shows how many people are making this important change. I found this new blog after following a trail. It's English, interesting and recommended.
Death by blackened liver or bullet in the chest,
84 (1) (b): Non-availability at reasonably affordable price
and ratios of weight to strength,
A pair of pristine pillowcases for patchwork projects - how's that for alliteration?
The peacock could desire the alchemy of fleeting moments from the dance of monsoon ripples on the lake
But it's still pretty cute...
And I’ve learned that those that truly cared have stood by me
Place strawberries in a large bowl and mash with a potato masher (I cheated and put mine in a food processor). Pour apple juice in a small sauce pan and whisk in pectin. Bring to a boil, stirring often, and boil 1 minute. Pour hot syrup over strawberries and mix well. Pour into 1 cup freezer containers (make sure to leave 1/2 inch at the top to allow for expansion when freezing). Place in the refrigerator over night, then store in the freezer.
a fucking cigarette
If Paul were singled out to be the apostle of the Gentiles he would have to have a different commission for, according to all prophecy, salvation would be of the Jews. The Lord said this in John 4:22. One will then reply, “Wasn’t Paul a Jew?” Of course but singular. The Lord said that salvation was to be of the Jews; of the nation who was, according to prophecy, to be a nation, or a kingdom of priests.
We had a Frank Spencer moment this morning when the paint pad my beloved was painting the stairwell with flew off the end of the pole, bounced on the stair carpet and landed on the dining room floor. I was just glad it wasn’t him bouncing down the stairs.
TONS of NEW stamps, something for everyone for sure!
I told the story of All Hallow's Eve and led into All Saint's Day. Gaining confidence, I added the meaning of Trick or Treat. Of course, it was all done in 2nd grade speak - making it far easier for mom to spin a yarn and sound really smart.
Huge houses filled to the rafters. Garages overflowing so that you can’t park your car in them.
So amazing on so many different levels.
“Are you in love with me?”
Film screening dates, trailers and short synopses:
The coach was frustrated. The process for that student to join the NCAA program had followed the normal channels: the student worked hard in high school, caught the eye of several NCAA coaches, filed with the clearinghouse, was accepted to the schools, earned a riding scholarship, and ultimately enrolled at the university that had recruited her the hardest. Everything should have worked out – but it didn’t.
5/28 - jim fixx 5 miler
These incidents highlights the responsibilities of these famous people. They must realize that day in, day out, they are in the public’s eyes. People search for their videos, pictures and the latest news about them. Every action should be calculated and precise because people of all ages from all over the world, thanks to the internet and the media, can know what they are up to. Whether they like it or not, they are role models. I am not saying that we all do everything that these celebrities and sports people do. However, I cannot deny the influence they have towards our choices. Otherwise, why put them in commercials? Terry and Suarez represents not only their teams’ ethos and pride, but also the whole of football. Similarly, Chris Brown represents hiphop and is a part of the whole music business.
AND COMPASSION,
Don't they just want to make you pick them up and read them all in one sitting?
My 365 project is falling way way by the wayside. I have the photos you know, I just need to catalog and upload… time consuming to say the least.
9. Under the Spell
Have you ever dreamed of getting married aboard a beautiful cruise ship? Maybe you dreamed of getting married on a sparkling white sand beach in Hawaii or the Caribbean. Get married like a Norwegian. Norwegian Cruise Lines has pulled out all the stops and offers a special wedding package just for you. I’ll help you coordinate your wedding with Norwegian’s wedding planner from the ideal ceremony location to the wedding officiant, to the reception, cake and sparkling wine. If you’re planning to get married at home, plan your honeymoon with one of Norwegian’s Romance Packages. Imagine dining in Le Bistro, gorgeous red roses in your stateroom, sipping sparkling wine, or enjoying a scrumptious breakfast in bed. Maybe getting a soothing massage, or a stunning portrait taken by Norwegian’s professional photographers that you’ll cherish for years to come.
“I’m interested in all the sidebars that ended up on the cutting room floor,” said Gordon.
I caught a glimpse of this...
Sing it with me, now (you, too, Aunt Shell!)
Got lots of smiles out of Leon this morning! Tiff asked me to take him for a little bit before I went to work so we snuggled. His crabs-a-lot attitude is changing and he's not so crabby anymore. Unless of course he's hungry or has a load in his pants...
As usual, we have used random.org to fairly select a random winner. It opted for number 21, making our winner coops from coops cluttered corner, with this fabulous card:
Thinking about this question, I was able to come up with one very good example--and it brought me to tears all over again. The day my grandpa past away. I was always very close to him, so when my grandma called my mom in the middle of an August night to tell her he had had a brain aneurysm and was in the hospital my world crashed down around me. He was always my favorite person. When my mom came to tell me that we had to pack and leave for Iowa quickly, I didn't waste anytime. We got everything packed, got in the car, and my mom drove--fast. He was in one of five hospitals in Des Moines, Iowa and each had a different exit. Because this was before the days of internet map guidance and GPS, we had to get off the interstate at each exit to see if it was the right hospital. As it turned out, my grandpa was in the last and furthest hospital. When we finally arrived, my grandma greeted us, crying, telling us he had passed away just minutes before we arrived. My heart broke, but I know that he did not want us to see him suffer. Eleven years later, the pain is still as raw as it was that day.
’cause I see sparks fly whenever you smile
I’ve found that some of the best advice I’ve ever received is often found in a meaningful line of text or by way of an unexpected introduction to a simple concept that I come across, here or there, perhaps via a blog or article, and it sticks with me. It’s those seemingly small, but inspirational thoughts that I can immediately draw upon and begin to implement in my life.
"No I guess not. I could be being stalked by ninja assassins and get shot twice in the stomach."
103. Minpins, The: Roald Dahl
When writing your character’s reaction, you don’t need to include all three. You can use only one or two, but unless you have a very good reason not to, keep them in order. Imagine how odd it’d be to read a paragraph that starts with dialogue, then internal thought, then an instant reaction. How backward would that character feel?
To all my readers:
Enjoy with Chappati/roti.
When you give up the wheel
Time and patience.
scant 1 cup pumpkin puree
33. If trousers say massah teef, yuh can’t doubt am. If someone close to you says something about you it is most likely true.
It all starts with paying close attention to children’s use of the Internet and cell phones without making them feel embarrassed or overtly supervised.
1 suds
Gardening by Sam Towers
So tonight my sister and I have been chatting and chilling. So I thought what would be a nice accompniament to a good chatter? I came to the conclusion Gammon!!
We returned to the campsite and went to find someplace to eat, we wandered along the main road looking for a cafe that we were told would be open. It wasn’t (later we found out that everything shut on a Monday) and Jacob through a moaning fit, which the two of us fell out over. His cheek is really getting to me, so I walked away, not allowing it to flare up.
Cut a jam sponge roll into slices about one inch thick. Remember to get the one with only jam in it, not jam and buttercream. If you cut carefully there will be exactly one slice left over for yourself.
dozen...a few always
Spent the day at the Louisville Zoo a few weeks ago and still haven't blogged about it. There are several posts that I need to catch up on!!
Men are often stereotyped as being dogs. I agree with this stereotype, so I will use the comparison to explain how you can train your partner to reach a higher level of satisfaction in the relationship, and how your partner can train you.
My self congratualtory moment was disturbed when I heard a "yoo hoo" from one of my neighbors. It was so shrill and off tone that I wondered if the possum could hear it.
Purple Potion is a mix of purple & copper micro glitter in a clear base. There's also a smidge of holo glitter in the mix to keep things interesting. Surprise, surprise, I love this one too! I can't remember if this was 2 or 3 coats, but I do recall that it needs a thicker top coat to make it smooth and shiny.
He had served in World War I and remembered World War II. He grew up without electricity or automobiles or telephones. He told a lot about his life, but mostly he concentrated on the late 1800s and very early 1900s. And at one point he made a curious statement which I can now relate to much better (being about half his age now).
In the United States, Flag Day is celebrated on June 14. It commemorates the adoption of the flag of the United States, which happened that day by resolution of the Second Continental Congress in 1777. So, in honor of this holiday, we are challenging you to make a project with any kind of flag on it.
-Down To The Waterline,
The entries will be judged by Carrie, Nikki, myself, and a couple of guest judges whom we haven’t determined yet. We’ll be looking at several factors, but first and foremost, we’re looking for enthusiastic, informative, and entertaining entries that will engage us–and your readers–in lively discussion. And we will award prizes to our top three favorites entries!
love leaps as it flies.
But are any of us wise enough to know that some other way would make us into better and wiser children? No, our Father in Heaven knows the best path, out of all possible paths, to bring us to completion (Psalm 142:3).
You can see this concept in action if you go watch this video:
20. “Unfaithful” by Rihanna – “Once a good girl goes bad, she’s gone forever.” RiRi wasn’t lying when she resurrected a Jay-Z lyric. Here, she is cheating on her lover, and he knows that she’s cheating on him. The worst part is that she’s happy with the other guy. Fortunately, she doesn’t want to cheat on him anymore. Out with the old, in with the new, I suppose.
Wow, I'm enjoying getting to know more about people from the scriptures! Anyway, I've seen and heard depiction of Jonah being in the belly of a whale in cartoons and such but reading and studying it from scripture is so fulfilling. Just like many of us readers find film adaptation of books quite not up to par. That said, I lack eloquence with words so I'm just going to quote from my Old Testament Student Manual titled, "One Should Not Flee from One's Responsibilities", hence a moral that one can get out of Jonah's journey:
On October 27, 2011, the euro zone leaders said they would bail out Greece, with European banks taking a 50% haircut off the value of their loans to Greece. This means Greece has technically defaulted on its debt. I believe Spain is next. Italy is not far behind.
before it finally cut but the effect is beautiful. This is one die that I will be using often.
Wow! Immediately I saw the value of adding this concept to the Radiant Child Yoga training so that teachers would find the good in the children they are working with. On a more subtle level, I saw the benefit of having 100% positive expectation for the “graduates” of the Radiant Child Yoga training; seeing them taking this work beyond what they learn from me, each in their own creative way.
But the goodness of people! Some others came to watch her finish & gave her their medals...
I want my soundtrack to be mostly classical, so while I write, I’ve been listening to the music that I might use for that scene. It sets the mood for the scene – happy, sad, mad, lots of action, or just people talking quietly. I’ve listened to Mozart, Beethoven, Handel (I’m using this for my funeral scene, I think), Jack Johnson, and Israel Kamakawiwo’Ole (Somewhere Over the Rainbow is related to my story – clouds, rainbows, the sky, etc.). And some Alexandre Desplat, mostly from Harry Potter and The King’s Speech, that I listen to for the sad and quiet-but-happy scenes, respectively.
and her weakness
What a noise it would be if we all together praised God for gifts we have been given. Right now I give thanks and praise for paramedics, specialist physicians, pharmacists. After a check-up today I realised what a difference these people have made to my life. Leaving the hospital, going to the train, I thought nothing of walking the 500 or so metres. But it hit me how, 18 months ago, to walk that distance took every ounce of strength I could muster. I even wondered if I would make it.
“I don’t know how other women do it because I’ve never been so sick and so tired in all of my life. I want this all over. “ She put her head on the table and sniffed.
Seems an obvious conclusion, doesn’t it? I’ve been saying for fifteen months that he’s gone, though I always accompanied the statement with a bewildered remark about not being able to fathom the sheer goneness of him. And yet somehow, someway, in the dark recesses of my mind, I felt as if we were on a break, as if I’d come to take care of my father for a while, just as I did for my mother, and soon I’d be going back to our life. It didn’t help that, when I drove away from our home for the last time, his car was sitting out in front as it always did when I left. (I’d donated it to hospice, and they hadn’t yet come to pick it up.) Nor did it help that I’d made this same trip, stayed in this same room several times before.
Hence, I am inviting you for this deal I will offer you 40% of the amount mentioned above as my patina and the rest will be for me, please if you are sure that you are capable to handle this transaction and you are ready to assist me to execute this business with trust and honest than the further details of the transfer will be forwarded to you as soon as i receive your return mail,have a great day.
6. “Helena Duel” – The lawlessness and everyday mayhem of the Toughest Town on Earth gave rise to the infamous “Helena Duel”. Two bad guys would be stripped. Their left wrists would be strapped together. Each, armed with a 3 inch blade, would then slash away at each other until one bled death from the wounds. Crowds of blood thirsty spectators would watch, cheer, and bet on the outcome.
I hope you have a fabulous weekend...
Joey
The film is also a marvelous companion to the book - they both really enrich each other. And experiencing either is like breathing in purified rural gold. People, get thee to this film - or rather, get thee to preserving this rich work! We can't let gems like these disappear. Ahh, Angleterre. Where's good ol' William Blake when ya need him?
In the case of Toohey’s New the answer is even more simple - perhaps, also, the drinkers of it. Certainly simple were the marketing brains behind it. Toohey’s produced an Old Ale and when the lager style arrived they were stuck for a name for their new product. Imagine that marketing meeting. “ Well, the old ale is old, and this new one is .. is .. Ooh, what’s the word I’m looking for? Help me out Ttrent with two T’s.”
Clipper City Brewing Co. Heavy Seas - Small Craft Warning (Über Pils)
The ball knocks me on the head and rolls away as I realize I just added another notch to the "The Plum Sox SUCK" club.
staking my garden down,
Life is too short to read bad books I say.
I cut beef (in this case) in cubes and marinated it in zesty Italian dressing overnight (shown in zip-loc bag) and then cut peppers, onion and pineapple into chunks.
Long story short: I missed the first 41 minutes of Idol and arrived just in time to hear Haley sing way out of tune. So instead of blogging the rest of the show, I'm just going to watch the rest of the singers and then go to bed. I will be on for the results show tomorrow night.
My neighbor explained that Tete de Moine has a rich history. The cheese is made by monks and has been called Tete De Moine since 1790 but it has an origin dating back to 1192. There is a thorough history of the cheese on the Tete de Moine website.
The image was coloured with Promarkers and then cut out using a Nestie allowing the mother goose's head to protrude outside the square.
I recognize that history changes, rights change, often there are conflicting rights, and one must always do whatever one can to minimize human suffering and seek as equitable a solution as possible (provided of course both sides are prepared to negotiate). Ben Gurion gave a far better analogy–the analogy of two families claiming the same home. That is closer to reality. Many Arabs migrated into Palestine when Jewish immigration created jobs and opportunities. But still, if two people do share a home they can negotiate a settlement and agree to a partition. But what if one side resolutely refuses to partition the house, then claims foul when he is evicted and keeps on trying to climb back in?
Kim shouldn’t see my like this. Not when his world is falling apart as mine is.
Neurons function as small on/off (0/1) switches that upon sufficient activation energy release neurotransmitters to signal other neurons which respond accordingly. Through patterns of neuronal activation, the neural network computes and controls all the body functions.
Turns out, I’m not as familiar with them as I thought. For instance, whenever I thought of the Mahabharata, I always had this vague idea that the story was about the fratricidal war between the Pandavas and the Kauravas and the politics behind it all. But there is so much more to it! There are hundreds of characters, each with his or her fascinating back story and motivation. So many little incidents that happen generations before the actual war actually make that event inevitable.
Over the last month, many Israeli leaders have shown their true face. When Zionist leader and strongman Banjamin Netayahu needed their support the most, they back stabbed him.
My second dance of the night was with L, a girl from Montreal. We danced before and she is a beautiful dancer. While I'm guessing she is in her early twenties, she is been dancing since she was really young, and it shows. Great connection, fantastic musicality, warm and comfortable embrace. I liked the music, I was inspired and there was still some space on the dance floor so it went really well. The two tandas we danced together were probably the best I've had this weekend (with the two tandas I had with Marika a close second, as I was really tired when I danced with Marika and I was not as inspired).
Jonah Lehrer is funny and his books are worth reading (he didn't say that, I did.)
I’ve spent my entire career in health care. First in a small doctor’s office. Later at a large, nationally known teaching hospital. And now, in the pharmaceutical industry. For me, helping to find a cure for the various illnesses that plague mankind was never a question of ‘if’, but ‘how’.
Last July I took a 1 year unpaid sabbatical from the part time finance job I'd done for the previous 7 years. I was going to concentrate on my writing.
big dog. big poop.
like pink skin under a deep greasy burry crimp of fleece.
Organizing the Resistance
As an adult, I've had two very personal encounters with the restless dead, though thankfully I've yet to see a ghost. One incident occurred when my husband and I rented a house that--after some very strange happenings--I found out had been the scene of a murder/suicide. (We moved.) The second incident occurred while I was staying in an historic brownstone in Savannah (officially labeled the most haunted city in America). Both incidents were enough to convince me that just because we can see something, doesn't mean it's not there.
portion
It look like the clerical collar is becoming a thing of the past. I see where, Pastor Ed Young have launched PastorFashion.com as a way to set a trend in today's pulpit. With the launch of the new site,the controversial pastor is hoping to motivate and empower today's church leaders in how to have swagger. Pastor Young say this is a site where pastors can go to get tips on looking their best.
Jenny chose this book because, she said beforehand, her daughter is teaching it in Toronto. At the meeting she said that what attracted her to it also, and the reason she liked it when she came to read it, is that it is indeed set in Toronto, which she knows very well, and she always likes books set in named places she knows, with street names and landscape she can identify. This is interesting to me as a writer, since however closely my settings are based on real-life ones, I often don't name them in an attempt to universalize: I have the sense that if readers aren't familiar with the real-life places, pinning them down with names can create an effect of alienation, a jarring injection of reality which can potentially destroy the spell of story.
Downloadable files of all this music is now available on the left sidebar.
Keller quotes Cynthia Heimel who wrote this article for the Village Voice and over years of journalism met hundreds of amazing people who thought they had “finally” broke into their richest dreams.
Yes! Yes, what is the rest of the story?
PRS for Music Most Performed Work
Plus, there's something to be said about just having time as a couple and not having to worry about changing diapers or trying to deal with a breakdown over whether or not we should really watch Barney or the Wiggles or Veggie Tales. You know, the big, big, taxing, stressful life decisions that two-year-olds struggle with...
Brouwerij St. Bernardus NV St. Bernardus Abt 12 (60th Anniversary "Special Edition")
Why do I feel so drawn to failure?
"Don't you read your Bible? At the Last Judgment, where it says 'the books were opened.' That means --"
For more information about Katherine, the blog tour schedule and West of the Moon, click on the tour poster above!
The readings were Psalm 103:1-18, Ephesians 2:1-10, Matthew 18:21 – 19:1. My reflection is given below:
Moving on...
Lyin' Ass Bitch by Fishbone
There will be a student council meeting for all the grade reps and the executive members tomorrow at 11:25 in room 213. Please bring your lunch.
Hi there, my name is HEATHER JACOB.
“Newcastle from the Rabbit Banks, Gateshead-on-Tyne” (1864)
Mr Nair added that he had never said anywhere in his parliamentary speech that “Investing in people = Nigerian scam” and described the attribution as ‘false’ and ‘misleading’.
Within five minutes of walking through the front door, the heavens open.
THIS is the view from the kitchen of our cottage.
ADDIS ABAB 00003211 002 OF 003
What even Borg did not expect was that his tax cut for the low-paid would increase economic growth so much that it has almost entirely paid for itself. Borg had created something that Osborne’s critics say does not exist: a self-financing tax cut. ‘There was some criticism at the time that we were borrowing to finance tax cuts,’ he says. But Sweden could do it, because it was expecting to return to surplus soon; Britain has no such luxury, he says. His main advice to Osborne is: ‘Keep on dealing with the deficit, because deficits destroy everything else.’
It’s just that simple.
The new aspect is the high throughput DNA sequencing approach, which allows determination of a larger number of animal and plant taxa than would have been possible through morphological and/or biochemical means. Various TCM-samples are suitable: powders, tablets, capsules, flakes and herbal teas.
“Yes, and” is positive and uplifting
This seems to be a common theme in my life.
Anyway, the premise of the books, from what I can gather, is that the rapture comes and carries away the pious, and the rest are left to fend off minions of Satan, or something along those lines. So, of course, some enterprising and righteous soul came up with this fabulous idea - a videogame, wherein you, the Christian hero, pump Jesus into these liberal gay demon bastards using a submachine gun.
When I realized what was happening I thought to myself- stop!
9. Vegas With Randolph-Above The Blue (Caged Giant)
- Gravitation is not responsible for people falling in love. ~ Albert Einstein
A: I would agree that Christmas has become a prime example of American’s distorting something pure for personal gain, however, I do think quite a few of the arguments you have presented are ignorant. To quote Penn Jillete(My personal favorite atheist and someone who I have IMMENSE respect for.) “Christians can be ignorant and stupid. But atheists can be just as bad if not worse.” You have to understand that reason and principles are a two way street at times. That is all L is saying. You keep using his words to make your point instead of using your own to make something from your own perspective.
FREE ADMISSION!
But not before I spend one very last weekend there getting it ready for the new occupants.
3. There's free wireless access for those of us with laptops wanting to ditch work early and drink beer.
This seems to be a very typical level of idiocy with dealing with Virginia Design Builders. They break things and are careless. They put a big white scratch across our downstairs door (which, fortunately, is already white, and has a sheath of rotting wood screwed to it to keep the main door from rotting)…. So they’re going to have to paint my door too.
Society is in danger of becoming fragmented by a preoccupation with homosexual rights, feminism and separate racial identities, the Archbishop of Canterbury has warned. Dr Rowan Williams claimed that identity had become a ‘slippery’ word and that, while much had been achieved for minority groups, it was time to focus on the common good.
On Thanksgiving, we had a wonderful feast with our new friends, the Andrews, who moved in over the summer. One of their daughters is in Theo's class at school, and their other son and daughter are each a grade off from Addy and Emerson in school, but are in their primary classes at church. Though the food was wonderful (it's always so much more wonderful when there's someone to share the cooking with!), the highlight of the evening was the Thanksgiving play that Theo and Ani co-directed all the younger children in. They had a script (from online) and everyone had lines to say, and it was so great to see it performed with such passion!
A Woman After God's Own Heart by Elizabeth George really changed my outlook on being a wife and a mother, under the tutelage of God. This merits a reread as well.
Lucy Coats: I found the results of the Olympians poll fascinating, and it’s set me thinking about why I like or dislike certain gods and goddesses. Zeus and Hera are bottom of the poll with 1 vote each—and yet they are King and Queen of the gods. Perhaps it’s that aura of untouchable all-powerfulness which people find offputting. Why vote for someone who has it all anyway? And yet, as you said youirself, Mary, they are necessary underpinnings for the whole canon of Greek myth.
Thanks to the publishers, Hardie Grant, five lucky Grab Your Fork readers will win their own copy of the first ever Eating and Drinking Sydney.
I'll dream paisley colored thoughts until the light show in the sky nudges me awake...an electrical parade just for me....
There is no girlish femininity about Joyce Cary's Government Baby, which follows Mansfield's story. It, like Kipling's story, tells a story of expatriates in an outpost of the British Empire called Dabbi, "where there was no butter, no potatoes, no ice; where newspapers were a fortnight old, the library consisted of two Edgar Wallaces and somebody's Auction Bridge with all the middle pages torn out, and nothing ever happened except in the native town which was a perfect nuisance in any case." As I have an irrational aversion to the medical profession, I was particularly pleased by Cary's comment that, "All doctors tend to autocracy, and Government doctors are tyrants."
25 The Threshold HouseBoys Choir - A Time Of Happening
Our elders should never be left to feel unwanted or as if they are a bother. Unfortunately, more times than not, that is exactly how they feel in today’s society. Some left alone to die, imagine the fear and sorrow their hearts must feel….some will have a room full of people awaiting their death but never were really there to make the last moments memorable. My hope for society is that we start to recognize where we have fallen short with elders and fix it.
Tina
In recent years, I’ve also spent a lot of time working in a law office, ironically, that specializes in helping people who are experiencing financial challenges to file bankruptcy. Starting in mid-2002 (long before working with the law firm), I also started researching financial trends, including global trends in the lending markets. As time went on, I focused more and more on the specific financial patterns of the middle class of the US in the last few decades- as well as the psychology behind those trends of activity. But, for a moment, let’s ignore the long-term and just focus on 2008.
You should definitely check out both their Facebook and Twitter pages, because they often run contests where you can win some tights for yourself. This Facebook Fan Page is devoted solely to their curvy customers, and there are some awesome ladies on there! They are very helpful if you have any questions about sizing as well. So check 'em out. These tights definitely add a great (and necessary!) pop of color to any wardrobe while helping keep you warm during the winter months! Happy shopping!
When the book then went into Harry’s dream I loved it because you got to see more of the connection. Harry is able to see what Voldermort is doing through dreams which is fantastic (but is used against him sooner or later).
There’s nothing much on my schedule for the next several days. Since the last several days have been fairly busy ones, I haven’t had any time to get some quilting done … so I’m hoping to spend some time with needle and thread these next couple of days.
People tell me, because it was before my time, that Gran Via reached its pinnacle of greatness during the two decades of the sixties and seventies. What the building of Gran Via did for Madrid was to introduce the city to the “shopping street”, like London’s Regent street or the Rue de la Paix in Paris. For the first time fashionable ladies could window shop and spend their husbands’ money on international luxury. Those type of shops, Dior, Burberry etc, are now out of the true centre in the Calles José Ortega y Gasset or Serrano, where the tourist never goes. In its prime Gran Via was THE place to see and be seen with fashionable cafés and society restaurants.
I've done a lot of things with my life and time. A student looked at my CV today and said: 'With all this...why do you work here?' It isn't easy to explain. Maybe I am underachieving but I don't want to push myself to the limit because I think if I did I'd malfunction. Already my body sends me little health warnings and I don't even feel as if I am pushing myself too much...but I do I want some balance if it is possible.
Okay,below left side picture is my new closer button.
And I don't want everyone to know. They are my best friends true, but there are things I'd like to keep to myself. There are things I wouldn't want to worry them with.
“ captivating journey through the mind of a young man who crosses the line and brings his darkest fantasies to life”
What? You were expecting me to start when you are at the cardiologist bismarck north dakota and Folk Songs and Fairy Tales Spring Concert where you can afford a specific refinance loan will cost you. To get a much better idea of where home value prices will be supremely qualified to assume a position as a part of your day.
One trend is the reprinting of books from over 40 years ago - John Burningham and more Golden Books for example.I love them - just hope it's not taking up space for new talent.
All of the politicians who went out of their way to insult the general and interfere, however indirectly it may have been, with his efforts can rest easy now. That includes Vice President Joe Biden, Senators John McCain and John Kerry and others.
Welcome to Pigeon Key, an island of rich history and an important base camp for the building of the 7-Mile Bridge, railroad trestles, viaducts & other bridges throughout the entire Keys. My own grandfather once worked on this island as a laborer! Coming here meant a lot more to me than 99% of the other tourists having no family ties to this tiny island. Pigeon Key was the only island stop for the old 7-Mile Bridge and was bypassed in the building of the new 7-Mile Bridge which is continuous for it’s nearly 7-mile run.
“But you’re not qualified. What about health and safety? That screwdriver looks sharp for a start. What if one of your children falls over? What if they start fighting?”
On the whole - 8.5/10
Total: RM150.50
06. Red Sky at Night
ODD GIRL!!!
And the ketchup
At least, I think they are Avril’s shoes. I went through some old photographs of when I was in Toronto and found these from the Bata shoe museum. It’s quite an interesting place – more so than you might think from hearing it’s a shoe museum. They had a great exhibit on the 1920s going at the time.
Abuja”, the bulletin added.
“The Making of White” features some excellent behind the scenes footage of Kieslowski making the film in Poland. He describes White as a “lyrical comedy” and also a “sad comedy.”
In Gassho,
I made pasta salad with this dressing also but I didn't take a picture - sorry :(
Forbidden Planet - the comics chain that has stores in London, Bristol and elsewhere - have bags of comics to give away that will provide you with a perfect jumping-in point, and they will be giving away loads of fantastic and cool titles to give away throughout the day.
He will be home tonight with a load of hay.
All ready to go. Ashley wanted to carry that pack to school. Everything for both of us save one sleeping bag is in that pack.
Our elites promote these as role models for our young people, but only promote honourable and worthy people as role models for ethnic minorities. If you walk around an inner city school or community centre the walls are festooned with heroes from the histories of ethnic groups like Gandhi, Marcus Garvey or Harriet Tubman.
Jesus Christ. I urge you, therefore, to dare believe the Word, and face your
2. New York Giants
For Christmas Billy and I got the boys two Cozy Trucks for them to play with. They both LOVE the trucks and the boys and I had a good time playing with them outside earlier this week. I just had to share the cute pictures that I got of them while playing. As they were playing and being soooo cute, it reinforced to me how much I love being a mom and how much fun they can be! I am so blessed to have such a wonderful husband and the two cutest, sweetest and loving boys!
"But the problem is that they behave like human beings and are very good tricksters," said Phiri.
1. How has the Internet changed the way we view information and information access?
thinking is a disease prevents from the actual being
So tomorrow is today
Heat a kadai, pour in the tamarind extract and allow it to boil for a while. Now add in the cooked bittergourd, ground paste and pressure cooked dhal. Allow it to boil till thick. Temper with the given ingredients.
A lot of great things have happened since I started this blog. I look at this space as my lucky charm. Furthermore, my life is richer for it. Writing, like all things, requires constant practice, and banging away here in my little corner of the blogosphere has not only opened doors to things I never thought possible, but has helped me perfect my craft. More importantly, it has introduced me to a brewery full of new friends.
Yes. Another one of those.
To set the tone of a fall-themed wedding, make sure that you send out the perfect invitation. The one we chose is a foldover design with an espresso envelope, ivory invitation and an elegantly embossed brocade design in tangerine (this year’s “IT” color, by the way). The tone is set further with perfectly coordinating attire for the bridal party; a haute couture – yet totally affordable – wedding gown that’s stunning on both a runway and in an outdoor wedding; glitzy accessories; a birch “bark” wedding cake; and lavish, fall fabulous decorations which can include rented birch trees (if the budget allows, of course). For the reception, bring the fall theme to the table with seasonally-inspired edibles such as a blood orange salad and an apple-based signature cocktail and end the evening with maple syrup favors for your guests!
Mirrored with permission from:
The times with you have suddenly gone far away with the wind
. . At that time I expressed my deep appreciation for the fact that you always have served as indispensable allies in some of the most important work our government does. And now, tonight, I once more have the opportunity to stand in solidarity with you, and to thank you for your constant, steadfast work to create a better country.
Myristal Ether Sulfate – See Myristic Acid.
analyst, factory worker and security guard, Damien Seaman’s short crime fiction, interviews and reviews have featured on numerous ezines and blogs. He has dabbled in petty smuggling, baboon-whispering, scuba diving and sunbathing, with varying levels of success. And don’t even ask about the Goddamned tennis lessons.
Runner-Up: Mike Hess’s Haircut – surprisingly (especially to him) included a beard and eyebrow shave, remnant whisker *burning* with a fiery little broom implement, a neck massage and knuckle cracking (hands).
And here are links to press releases from ABC-member newspapers detailing their circulation numbers and strategies:
In our never ending quest to simplify our lives I have found that knitting is a good skill as well as a wonderful method of relaxing in the evening time. I like to think that anything you can make for yourself at home is a wonderful alternative to store bought items. Not to mention that these cloths make wonderful Christmas presents.
Stamps of Life - Love2Hug
Phase 4 – Anaerobic Conditioning
Oh sure, every parent thinks their baby is beautiful and precious, and they all think their children are sweet, special and say the most adorable things. What further proof do you need of evil intent than this obvious mind-control, considering the facts?
...Juicy Couture is an oxymoron and an insult to the word 'fashion'. Unless your intentions involve some twisted form of postmodern irony, leave the towelling to the bathroom honey.
Can I get lost in you when you find your way back to me
One of the marks of a born again believer is his philanthropy; his willingness to give to others who are in need; to give so that the gospel may have free course. He is to be open to the Lord and be willing to do His will in helping fellow members of the body of Christ. Oh, it is easy to pray but how sincere, how earnest is that prayer? Do you really want prayer to be answered? Are you willing to do your part?
No problem Ms. Yao, sorry I'm going to leave you now and go talk to the normal people over there. Oh, and the name of my drink is "Shut the f*ck up," I mean "Shush."
After that, with all the different magazines, newspapers, online sites, music review blogs and everywhere else, just keep asking! There are thousands all over the country and all over the world. The more reviews you can get, the more you can get opinions, views and reviews in a second voice to back up the voice you are putting out there, the better.
For those of you that have not seen this film, SEE THIS FILM! I had heard the name for years, as well as the lauditory comments made about Peter O'Toole's performance, but until I watched it I had no idea what I was missing. This film is the ultimate "epic". The scope of the story, the music, the scenes, the acting; it's all so huge and so beautiful, it just wraps you up, and you don't want to be let go. While the first part of this film (before the intermission) is admittedly better than the second, upon subsequent viewings, the second part gets better and better.
What you see below are links to my flickr set for the photos I’m posting for this challenge. Click on any photo below to go to flickr and then you can navigate through the set with the “Previous” and “Next” arrows at the top.
5ptsalt has obtained a full transcript of the interview and we can’t help but wonder, why the concealment?
Back around May 2009, James from BrewDog kindly sent a mixed box of beers which included a couple bottles of the Paradox Isle of Arran edition (batch 016). Well, that was before I dirtied my bib by publishing this*. I'd been hanging on to these to sample with a whisky nut in work, and since then had also picked up a couple of the Smokehead (batch 015) and Springbank (017) versions, still biding my time. Well, that time more or less went after I moved house to go live in the sticks, but I did know a couple of big whisky fans down where I now live, so New Years Eve was a good opportunity to test drive these beers and share with a German whisky fan.
I remember I asked her to watch after her sisters and she immediately put an arm around each twin and said, "Don't worry, I'll be the bestest mom you never had."
– SP
In an ongoing eWedNewz investigation new information involving alleged websites that sell inferior knock-off merchandise to American consumers could put a dent in the action, as dress manufacturers mobilize against the sources in China.
Normally I started wondering what if there were no frontiers on this earth,maybe we could really speak all those languages
I think it's essentially a year of mindfulness and purposefulness and many other important nesses. I just want to make sure I'm that kid in the front row of the class with my hand stretching into the air so bloody earnestly that you can see most of my pants and my face is red and contorted with the effort of getting that hand up there and I'm waving and screeching 'pick me, pick me'. That's the kind of year I want to have. I want to be better.
I'm the only one there.
I have always had a vivant imagination. When we lived in Maryland We drove 295 south to get to DC. It is a very wooded highway. The trees in Maryland are very very tall. It is a rich green state. Many times when we were driving down the I-295 I could envision slaves escaping in the wood. I could almost hear them running along side the road . Running for their lives. Maryland had large population of slave that worked mostly in the house and some in the fields. They escaped North when every they had the chance. The harbor was a shipping port for slavery. Most of the slaves were brought to the harbor and then dispersed throughout the country down south. Every year in Maryland they reenact the slave’s march to honor history. I could hear the slave’s feet running through the woods heading north for freedom. This drawing was inspired from that experience.
Had to include this awesome picture!
This case is set to go to Trial in May. It is long awaited and many hearts cried out for this little girl. The writer of this blog committed all of her time and resources to covering the story and now the moment that was waited on has come. Now there’s a monkey wrench. Jose Baez has been on this case for over a 2 years. What will this do for the case?
If you want to, you can pick up Kwik Sew 3504 from Fabric.com now. That might force them to re-stock before May. If you can find it elsewhere, that's fine too.
I say hello to the Sun smiling and I say see you later to the Sun smiling.
But in my attempt to take Good Burp to the next level, I plan on posting interviews with some of todays newest and brightest breweries, playing in Sam Calagione's Bocce Ball tournement, and hitting as many breweries as I can. In addition, I'm planning a 5 city, 3 country tour of northern Europe (yes Belgium is on that list) this fall. And before I go, I will have a list of breweries, beer, and pubs to try along the way. What I am willing to do for all of you, my fans.
I know 3 girls who are currently pregnant with little boys and two who just had little boys so I've been sending a lot of baby gifts. Now unfortunately it's a little less fun to shop for baby boys because the selection is so limited. I always want to give something cute because its a baby... babies are cute, and the mommies are clearly girls. This is a perfect gift. Unlike a diaper cake it these are easily shippable ( I live far away from most of my friends who are expecting) and they are full of great stuff. Socks, Diapers, and Baby Wash Cloths. Not to mention they are just sooo cute! What a great gift idea!
to sunder me from earthly joy, to hinder what delights had been.
- Emptiness in the eyes (like no one is home… this can also be seen in those who are simply highly mind-controlled among other reasons).
I reserved this through LuxeBox’s “First in Line Program” where I got to pick a product I want to be in my Luxebox. The color is beautiful, greyish lavender with a sheen to it. It is called “She’s Picture Perfect” which is part of the Resort 2012 Summer Collection. I can’t wait to try it after my current polish chips off.
As nostalgic as I am about the whole life buying/creating process, I am getting pretty ready to bust out the clippers and start thread snipping.
The British Imperialism in the region was simply the proverbial straw that broke the camel's back. There were other pressing matters such as the constant border wars & growing land shortages. The notable consequence relating to the abolition of slavery which might have in fact played a role in causing the Great Trek was that the former slaves were now wandering all over often attacking local residents. Piet Retief only mentioned the abolition of slavery in his Manifesto in a vain attempt at getting the tacit support or understanding of the slave owning Cape Dutch. Who in fact often looked down at the Boers & ridiculed them for wanting to trek.
VAIL, Colo. (AP) - A 60-year-old man is taking an 8-year-old boy and his dad to court, claiming the boy caused a ski-slope collision that left the older man with a shoulder injury.
Back in February of 2009, not long after I started this blog (itself an outgrowth of a two-year series of session beer-related posts on my main blog, Seen Through A Glass, that started here), I wrote a piece for Ale Street News in which I suggested that the faint, first rumblings of the collapse of extreme beers could be heard. Earlier, I did a piece titled "Extremely Annoying" for BeerAdvocate magazine (which you can find here, and thanks to Teri Fahrendorf for that!), a single contrarian voice in an entire issue devoted to -- pardon the expression -- ball-washing extreme beers in which I suggested that making extreme beers wasn't that big a deal: throw more stuff in, get a bigger monkey. That, in turn, was an expansion of my "it's just a bigger burrito" argument, originally made here in October of 2006. In short, and in a nod to Barbara Mandrell, I was session when session wasn't cool (that's assuming, of course, that it is now...but we'll get to that).
Every year, the owners, associates and makers of Round Table pizza convene to discuss life, love and politics. Or maybe they just talk about pizza. Regardless, our company is annually tasked with conceptualizing a complete set of collateral for the roughly 200-person event. This year, an external source provided the logo, which would become the foundation for all of our designs. Had I been in creative control, I caaan’t say I’d have opted for this particular logo (or its color scheme), but life’s full of roadblocks, idn’t it? Given what was provided, I focused on the gold and blues and opted for what I like to call a “preppy, grosgrain” layout for the first piece in the series.
Those verses hit me like a ton of bricks the other night. “How can my kids call on Christ and preach it to others,” (my paraphrase) unless they see me do it.
TL: The version in the magazine was:
Five years ago, the PlayStation 2 bedeviled the gaming market. Admitting beneath the awning it was beneath able than a lot of of the competition, its all-inclusive library and acumen as a DVD amateur put the atramentous box in about every gamer’s animate room. (While some aspect the PS2’s success to accepting aboriginal on the market, this is untrue, as the less-successful Dreamcast predates it by about a year.)
I’ve a 40% coupon right here in my purse
Part of Ali Edwards online workshop for One Little Word is to create an album/journal to help keep your word cultivated throughout the year with her monthly prompts. I've been wanting to create an art journal for a while, and I thought this was as good an opportunity as any...I'd actually have something to journal.
The existence of Rednano Locate is then made known by the newspaper article to the large public, who read newspapers. This medium plays an important role. Newspapers reach out to the vast public in Singapore as most Singaporeans are literate nowadays due to their educations. Also, most literate people have knowledge of using technology and hence, they should be able to use this new technology tool. In addition, the news coverage of this tool address an unobtrusive issue in Singapore, it has a greater effect as more locals can relate to the food-loving and the modern culture. Hence, I feel that this new technology tool will be a success.
I've had this as my work room for just over ten years, when we moved from London to Oxfordshire. A ground-floor study for me was a priority. But a beautiful desk was not needed. The one I have is of pine and was actual;y bought for my middle daughter. She couldn't fit it in her London flat and the desk was in our garage. But now I have it and it is very useful for its drawers.
What I think about this card now: Well, first, it's probably the most out-of-focus, far-away team photo in the whole set, which might explain why the Cubs stuck with floating head team cards for most of the '70s and early '80s.
Did you read the book and watch the movie? Do you think the movie did the book justice?
...one thing I’ve learned from being called for jury duty is that, as long as I answer questions honestly, there’s no chance whatsoever I’ll ever be picked...the truth, you might say, sets me free...
At the heart of this madness, at the root of the perversion of all that is true is political correctness. To live by the rules of political correctness is to live a lie, for it exists only to distort, suppress and destroy the truth. Those who dismiss political correctness as harmless or benign eccentricity are fools and are doomed.
If you’d still like to press that 4 weeks is a lot of time, consider this: if we didn’t have that time off, we’d kill your kids because we have to see them everyday, put up with their BS everyday, help you raise them everyday.
One person told me they were a way of carrying a partial photo of a secret lover, "secret" implying they would not want to carry the entire photo for fear of exposure.
For my own piece i put together all the elements that you see as this was my first try i feel it lacked a bit of creativity and purpose but with practice i hope to get better at it. My favourite element in the piece is the rainbow i added i feel its goes well with the lighting of the sky + clouds, i also like the ground before i added any texture it was just a simple desert floor but i decided to add a texture to bring it more to life.
Tuesday November 10th 1 to 3pm and 5:30 to 8pm
As mentioned, last year I heard tell of a group opening up a business to be called "Hot Bird" and I think I heard some newcomers mention the people who started it "had come back" which I highly doubt. I just don't imagine the folks I jonesing to bring the bird back.
Mabel Simmons, highly more recognizable as Madea, is a character portrayed by Mr. Perry as an extremely tall black elderly woman. She is about seventy five years old, very argumentative, and will threaten people with the gun she keeps with her regardless the occasion. She has a criminal record that goes back to when she was nine years old when she was arrested for shoplifting. She has been charged with illegal gambling, check fraud, identity theft, insurance fraud, assault, attempted murder, and car theft. She has a history of running from the police. In the movie “Diary of a Mad Black Woman”, Madea was charged with criminal trespassing, reckless endangerment, criminal possession of a handgun, assault with a deadly weapon, driving with a suspended license, driving a vehicle with an expired registration, and reckless driving.
The primary industry of the countryside is the growing of food on the open bits, the woody bits on the fringes of the open bits carry wild things that are delicious or colourful, or a nuisance, or all of the above. I am going to have a chat about what I think about the way the countryside goes about its country ways with weapons.
As he tells these personal stories, Lewis slips in the difficult stuff along the way. He feeds in just enough technical information to allow his readers to follow what’s happening and understand his characters’ motivations, without ever leaving them gasping for air. He explains by helpful analogy, and recaps his explanations at useful intervals.
I came across this article on The Telegraph online and decided I had to share it with our blog readers. There are some really interesting and great fact’s about Scotland, some of which we didn’t even know about! An excellent fact file about Scotland.
I created this card for Our Daily Bread "your favorite stamp" which is a hard challenge for me because I have so many favorites :). But I chose this one called "Easter Blessing". I just love this flower.
I talked to Kate and Tim Wheeler at Mudhook; Tim had brought his Deep Sea Stout, and I was taken by it: a big (7%) stout, kind of in the export stout vein, with a lot of flavor, and real ale yeast esters, a beer that hadn't been sanded and polished to the point of effeteness; I liked it, and told him so.
Sentiment stamp - Lili of the Valley
The veil has thinned, the veil has thinned
To a Death Eater born.
There is even a seaslug Mandelia microcornata named after Mandela by two marine biologists who discovered it, Angel Valdes and Terry Gosliner.
Master is a deeply engrossing story which is fairly straight forward from beginning to end. Based on the title of the novel and the actions in Magician: Apprentice it is obvious that the book will revolve around Pug’s capture and his training to become a Master Magician. This book involves more political intrigue and less action than Magician: Apprentice but the author manages to make the political intrigue
But let me explain. I have been busy with school and work (what else), but worse still, I have been travelling a lot too, and missing classes and having work pile up on me like nobody’s business.
On the prep level, a current mark that is very worth noting is the early season state leading 800 time of 1:56.00 by Danny Tarango of El Paso Burges. A great time for mid-February from this young sophomore. Wow. I can't wait to see what he (along with El Paso Austin's Ramon Garcia) gets down to by May, much less by May 2012.
The beer I chose to review is one of their latest seasonal offerings, the Beachcomber Summer ale. This beer is styled after a German weissbier and pours to the colour of a golden west coast sunrise. Its unfiltered so its opaque as well. The pour leaves a wonderful fluffy white head atop the beer. When you bring it to your face you are hit with the wheat beer scent. Banana, spice and wheat all attack your olfactory. It tastes like every good wheat beer should, minimal bitterness, a bit of spice and a crisp finish. It’s served from their 341ml bottles at a 5.3% ABV. This beer, when poured right, makes for a very nice session beer. A great quaffer if you will. It does appear to be a bit of a polarizing beer though. I really like it, but my wife & Frank (freelance leapbeer acquisitionist) didn’t like it. It really is a love it or hate it beer. It is also of note that this beer pack had a small card explaining the tasting notes of this beer, which is a nice touch.
But before the study could begin, the agency then put a so-called hold on the trial after cysts were discovered in some mice injected with the cells. Geron had to do another mouse study and develop better ways to check the purity of its cells.
Daniel and I tried for many months to find a publisher for a Robot 13 Trade paperback collection... Only to come back to the point where we realized that we needed to do it ourselves.
Best length: 4'6" or 5'0"
Let's have a laugh. Enjoy some of my favorite links, just a few but you'll take it & like it.
Henry Fernandez, 23, New York, N.Y.
Afternoon all second post for me today, please scroll down for my Love to Create Challenge card... I have been so busy today out and about doing chores.
I hope the sentiment encourages him along with the thought that someone cares! After all, that's why we do this hobby isn't it..? That and the unhealthy addiction to paper... :-)
Clouds collapse and then form a circle as they re-join,
(626) 798-6236
Wow, did my spirit need that.
In the fourth image I did a change to the photo by cropping out the chair in the photo. I think this change just enhances the photo. I revised the file name as ZakeyaMurphys Peedy My Change
I put the key in the ignition anyway, but didn’t turn the engine on. Our car began to roll backwards. I frantically pushed down the brake pedal. The rolling slowed, but continued. I heard our car hit the BMW behind us. I increased the pressure on the brake pedal, but we kept rolling, pushing the BMW out into the street.
News coverage of the DOJ’s case has been almost uniformly critical. When large publishers, small publishers, independent booksellers, Barnes & Noble, Apple Corporation, the American Booksellers Association, and the Authors Guild all agree that this case is terribly wrong, it’s time for the Justice Department take a step back and re-assess what’s doing.
Usually when I photograph someone, I spend time with them to establish a rapport and trust. I arrange the background so it’s uncluttered, and the lighting to help generate the mood I’m after. I take many shots, showing them as I go, so we can work together towards achieving an image we are both going to be really happy with.
17) Wanna see my socks? +
“Yes, if we’ll have you. And just because you’re smart, don’t think we will. You’ve been enough of a dickhead the last three years that Greg’ll blow his nut when he sees you tagging along.” She spun around and marched off again.
Melt together ingredients for layer three and spread over second layer of crackers. Cool. DO NOT BAKE. Cut into bars.
Former top cop Jackie Selebi, who was jailed for corruption in August, is also included. The prisoner's window to the right of the table shows Selebi looking out licking his lips. "He'd like to be at the table," said Shapiro.
invaluable resource for worship leaders everywhere, particularly for
This is Beaky, a former Prospect Park resident missing part of its beak and loved by locals. It was probably one of the 400 geese euthanized last Thursday.
While looking for articles on the connection between PKD and one of my favorite bands, Sonic Youth (their album 'Sister' pictured above was named for Dick's obsession over his dead twin sister Jane), I stumbled onto an interesting archived radio show from WNYC recorded in 2004. The show, Spinning on Air, features David Garland (perhaps related to the andy police sergeant in Do Androids Dream of Electric Sheep?) spinning records by Radiohead, Sonic Youth, as well his own strange mashup of John Dowland and PKD. The show also features PKD audio recordings including his dictated notes on a planned sequel to 'The Man in the High Castle' made while Dick's arm was in a sling recovering from shoulder surgery. It's interesting to note that Dick may have initially imagined writing about his 2-3-74 experiences in this sequel, creating a character who encodes secret messages into Nazi propoganda. That could have been really cool.
However, capitalism does not disappear overnight.
You, too, are of the same star stuff as Mother Theresa and are abundant beyond your nature. Live it for that is the Universal Way.
of our Lord Jesus Christ
I recently began my newest journey: biblio/poetry therapy. Starting in September I will be training to become a poetry/literature/journaling coach, basically using the written word to facilitate expression and healing for people. Although my start date is not for a few months, I am in the application process, and have begun attending the monthly group meetings. I have found these meetings inspiring and cathartic. I love to write, but lost faith in myself years ago after some bad criticism. I am just now beginning to open up again to writing creatively, and have found that the words come easier than I thought. I’d like to share something I wrote during my last group meeting. The facilitator gave us a bunch of images to choose from, that would spark us to write. I chose an image of underwater plants moving toward the surface of the water for sunlight:
But it's okay. None of this will throw me. It's Electric Boogaloo time.
So, as I think I mentioned ages ago, we're going to the Northeast Unschooling conference near Boston, and leaving in TWO DAYS!! I'm a mix of excited and nervous, which I will explain below...
Just found out it's hard to view your blog when linking, anybody sorted that out yet? any help appreciated! thanks!!
Manager of the Season – ALAN PARDEW: Whatever position Newcastle finally end up, I believe they should be content with. They have punched above their weight and while a Champions League place would be a glorious end to their season, I think it’s the experience gained from their exploits this season that would stand them in good stead for many years (especially if they can keep the core of the group together).
I have a less expensive alternative and guess what? It’s not labeled as a correcter, it’s a NYX Jumbo Lip Pencil! Yeah ladies, that’s right! The color Almond is the perfect peach that color corrects, so say good bye to your under-eye circles .
I had the usual type passengers in the cab this week, not one really stood apart from the others. Sometimes I can go for weeks before I get someone in my cab that sticks out from the rest. Someone that does something or says something worth writing about.
Third round I was up against the Merc player running McBain with Cylenna Raefill’s unit (sp?) and two heavies. The army was beautifully painted by the Gator player who has talent to spare. Probably the prettiest army, close to the ever gorgeous Ret army that you see on all my tourney reports.
First of the month.
-3.7″ WVGA display
Bogus policemen nabbed after robbery
He met a coachman driving his coach
One of my scrappy friends was making these little albums the last time we met together (thanks Kim)!!. I was just dumbstruck that had never seen this before, and kicking myself of all the cards I had thrown away over the years that I wished I would have saved, but had no clue how to organize or keep them. Just think of all those baby cards, wedding cards, anniversary cards, birthday cards, and Christmas cards - not saying you need to keep everything, but some moments we must treasure and keep!!
Like beaks they tear raw flesh apart.
but something terrible, black, and wholly alien that you
I enjoyed playing my new violin. Things went without a hitch until the weekend the band room at my high school caught fire or was robbed (I can’t remember which) and I happened to admit, “Oh no! My violin was in there!” My parents almost had a heart attack. I got a lecture about taking care of valuable things, which I completely deserved, and I was on pins and needles all weekend and into Monday morning until I could get in to the school and discover that my violin was ok.
Of vile, incurable sores on innocent tongues, -
Firstly: Bob Marley is an inspiration, he gave himself to the world, and all he wanted was everyone ‘black white Chinese’ to live as one… ONE LOVE, ONE HEART, LETS GET TOGETHER AND FEEL ALRIGHT! I love him more than I thought after the film and highly recommend it. Although the world is not at peace yet, his songs comfort and help us. He said if he can’t help the people his life wasn’t worth living, I think it’s amazing how driven he was. I felt…feel inspired. After I have revised (?) I am going to listen to my Bob Marley ‘Legend’ record.
I went to the bathroom stripped clothes and went right to bed with my makeup on and everything.
Queen
Edward Blick was succeeded in 1867 as the Rector of St Mary's by Edward Josselyn Beck who continued to promote building projects. The 1803 rectory, next door to the former Peter Hills School in Rotherhithe village was enlarged in 1869. In 1870-2 the church of St Barnabas was constructed on Plough Way by William Butterfield. The first local authority school in Rotherhithe was established on Albion Street in 1872.
Blue shoes today, to bust my blues.
I haven't really enjoyed my Birthday in years... Since I was 13 or so, Birthdays reminded me of all the things I hadn't done in that year (all the things I thought would be good to do at X age, that never happened). A time to feel sad about all the things in my life that weren't the way I wanted them to be. Isn't that a horrible way of looking at things?
I sigh.
Damian really shouldn’t have been a main character. And technically he should be part of the new batch of characters they added on when the originals started getting too old. But he really only ever interacted with Manny, Emma, and Liberty. And that’s pretty much all he did was serve as a hook-up for each of them. He dated Manny for legit 2 seconds. Then Emma was tired of being predictable so she started dating him. He then cheated on her with Liberty, at prom. SCANDAL! After graduation he was never heard from again, thank the Canadian gods.
Edmund Spenser 1552?-1599
Now what’s his name?
Let us leave aside the question of how they selected the objects.
Also in the annual chic are a alternation of stylus-oriented minigames. You’ll alpha out with eight games, but as you play through the adventitious you’ll be able to acquisition and bolt rabbits, anniversary of which gives up a key that unlocks accession new minigame. The minigames are varied, fun, and addictive. Anniversary one usually revolves about one specific activity, such as appliance the stylus to draw aback a ballista and blaze shots at parachuting bob-ombs amphibian down from the top screen, animation curve that become trampolines to accumulate three Marios bouncing about from awning to screen, or even arena a bold of Anamnesis at Luigi’s casino.
and now here is your chance. The name of the creator is HarryKindergarten and these are true gems! Next time you are on youtube look up HarryKindergarten!!!!
Anyways, here he is ...
In year ten, the first year of studying GCSE subjects (in theory), I hated art. A lot.
The pepper mill was empty! Oh no!
As with Barry Bonds however, prevailing public opinion is that Clemens was a user, whether or not that is actually proved in court.
Good day all! What a dreary day here in upstate NY. This little girl will soon chase the blues away...this is Jane. Jane will be listed on the TDIPT's website tonight a 9:00 pm. Just click the TDIPT link on the upper right of this page. Jane measures 9 3/4 inches small. She is just a sweet as can be! Please stop by tonight and look at all the amazing artist's and their offerings..
Once the girls go off to school, I will take my morning tea, newspaper, journal, and current work-in-progress (whether it be a chapter I'm working on for my middle grade novel or an article) and bask in the beauty of our blooming gardens and sunshine. I start this glorious ritual off with reading about local and world events, journaling about what muses me at the moment and of course ending it with my gratitudes of my blessings. It certaily sets a positive tone for my day!
1 cup butter, room temperature
Brendan’s Hair & Makeup: Peter Beard
As I witness the decline of the Episcopal Church, I want to shake those bishops and priests who have taken such liberties with Christian theology that their Church can no longer be characterized as a country club for rich white folks. A more appropriate characterization might be that of the "pusher" who feeds his junkies with soul stealing lies and feeds their insatiable appetites for new addictions.
Here’s the KISS party rules:
singing Gilbert and Sullivan.
Cape Town - The police force admitted on Tuesday that a lack of discipline and weapon control was "worrying", after it came to light that police had "lost" 20 429 weapons since April 2004.
"Hey, Bubba, Big Jim, Duke and Slim -- I went to the gun shop for more ammo. I'll be back in an hour. Don't mess with the pit bulls: they attacked the mailman this morning and messed him up real bad. I don' think Killer took part in it but it was hard to tell from all the blood.
I feel the greatest reward for doing is the opportunity to do more ~ Jonas Salk
This is not a repeat. This is post number 2,001. I republished this card both as a reminder to enter the contest and as a lead-in to my next judging fiesta, namely, figuring out the biggest improvement and bust in the history of Donruss.
Charles Christian sees this potential development as an encouragement to smaller eDiscovery players to “look for an exit”, that is, to get themselves acquired as soon as possible. There are many other reasons why they might want to do this, of course.
Grated cheese (I use good old Tasty Cheddar, but whatever you like)
So I bought an excellent book about wiring a house – it’s designed for homeowners, and starts with the real basics, ending up with very well illustrated diagrams for basically everything you’d want to do in a house.I REALLY recommend it if you feel like touching the wiring in your house.
After himself and a colleague received an on the spot penalty fine of £25, he's set up a Facebook group "Stop the DLR Penalty Fines Rip Off" which he urges people to join and also to appeal against the fines.
Affordable drink specials, featuring fine beers from Vancouver Island’s Phillips Brewing Company!
However it differs in that it deals with the history, legends and philosophies of the middle-east and instead of India.
Must have some college classes in psychology, education, or related field. Bachelor's degree preferred.
Cassandra was rather distressed by this sudden contact from her family, and more so at the conundrum of the newly arrived pair: Jory was affected by a magical geas to see his contract through, an arrangement he insisted was a voluntary one for the considerable pay he’d received. Daveth, in the meantime, was revealed to be a former pit fighter of some repute in Katapesh whom won his freedom and had since come bereft of such arcane assurances. After much debate, Cassandra accepted the arrivals and daunting mule train into the fortress before penning a reply to the letter she’d received from her parents–leaving no uncertainty as to her feelings on their continued avenues of trade.
My family and I are planning a holiday to India when my son says to me, “Hey Daad (sic), can we meet your friend Pramod this time when we are in India? You can always Google his name and maybe you. . . well, you know. . .” Google! Okay, son, got it!!
wispy pre-Raphaelite feminism as Fleetwood Mac's Stevie Nicks
-Jericho brings Punk back into the ring and exposes the top turnbuckle.
Ah…that old chestnut again. I’ve written about the plight of undercover mums and dads: too afraid to be open about the demands of parenthood, lest they are seen as soft or unreliable at work.
Who am I in this distinction, of being locked up in a cage where it’s all me and myself riding the mount towards the path of life?
So today may not be Irving R. Feldman's birthday, but it is my father's. At last check his plans are to go out to a nice Italian restaurant. With any luck, he won't have to order a flashlight with his carpaccio. Happy Birthday, Dad.
Oh Chip. I bet you thought you had it made every time you confronted those innocuous children, munching away on their Cookie Crisp. Even now, you berate my every cinema trip to see a family-rated movie – from Rango through to Cars 2 - with your airboat and your jetpack, and every single time, no matter how hard you try, you never succeed at getting that delicious cereal.
But when things don't turn out well we should be reminded both of our inability to accomplish everything we intend, as well as the fact that God may be trying to get our attention. Several illustrations will make my point.
The first thing is to recognize that your belief that organization is critical to a happy and contented life…is truly your belief – it belongs to you. If the other person does not hold that belief, then conflict is insured when you try to impose your belief on them. The reality is that you are living with a person who has a different belief about orderliness than you. There is no good or bad in that difference. There is only the difference. Trying to convert them to your way of thinking is a recipe for disaster (as I am sure you have already discovered).
Now if that doesn’t sound like a “couch potato” sort of day, I can’t think of anything that does. So I hope you will forgive me for not being very productive.
Research has indicated that vitamin B12 deficiency is a risk for vegetarians, especially vegans. Those choosing a vegetarian diet should watch carefully to ensure they get enough active vitamin B12 from diet and supplements. Deficiency of this vitamin poses particular risk to pregnant women and nursing mothers.
When Josh was first diagnosed (and back when we thought that his visual impairment issues would be his primary disability) we went to another doctor, who practiced at a hospital closest to us. This doctor did not have a very good "bedside manner". She exuded very little patience with actual people and a lot of fascination with "cases". I felt like she never actually looked at me. It was a strange experience of going to an eye doctor and not being seen. She was one of those people that made you wonder why certain people go into pediatrics. She was so clearly not a kid/ baby person. She wasn't great with stressed out parents either. Maybe she felt like little kid eyes would be more challenging to deal with? During our second visit with her, Joshua (who had really bad reflux at that time) threw up all over her and me in a massive fountain or semidigested formula. It was our last visit with this particular doctor.
It remains unclear to me whether that was an example of Russia Today’s sloppy unprofessionalism or disregard of questions. The channel’s latest star is Julian Assange, who has yet to face accusations of sexual coercion in Sweden.
I know. You're wondering what in the world Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles and grilled cheese could possibly have in common. I mean, they probably ate them at some point but besides that assumption, it seems ridiculous to pair them. Unless you want to write about a grilled cheese sandwich you made last week.
I have lots of pictures today, that I can share with you. Because I had a great weekend! :-)
After my three somewhat hard running days, I took Monday off running and rearranged my running schedule a bit.
By around 5pm our house was packed and by 730, everyone who said they would be there was there. Our small home was filled with all the important people in our lives. I couldn’t have asked for a better turn out or a better group of people to share our home with.
How did I do it? I stopped, took a deep breath and decided I would go towards what pulled me. I am an 80's baby through and through so of course I felt pulled toward three of my all time favorite movies, The Breakfast Club "Does Barry Manilow know you raid his wardrobe?", When Harry Met Sally "I'll have what she's having" and Ghostbusters "He slimed me!". Now, I know there are others I plan to buy but these were the ones that tugged at me. Not just because of their epic and aptly applied monikers but because they are amazing and beautiful! To round out my purchase I knew I needed (and I mean that literally!) the ridiculously blazing hot red sparkly beauty named "I wanna do bad things to you" which is from the TV show True Blood.
From the O’Brien family we see how grace and human nature play out. Jack’s childhood in Waco, Texas, begins in innocence. With a capable father (Brad Pitt) and an almost angelic mother (Jessica Chastain) who is loving, nurturing, grace manifest, young Jack’s (Hunter McCracken) early days are blissful. Two younger brothers later, the siblings form a close bond. But as the boys grow older, the father becomes stern and strict, callous with his sons, demanding total obedience, expecting love where the seeds of fear are sown. From this character, we see human nature manifest in its destructive, self-seeking mode.
I love to blend and bleed my colours all at once, usually with quite a bit of layering and attention to detail. The result is a bit of a paradox: spontaneous and experimental but also controlled and precise.
At least, we assume they are.
Let her know what you really think of Murakami. See if she got through the first chapter of Fellowship. Understand that if she says she understood James Joyce’s Ulysses she’s just saying that to sound intelligent. Ask her if she loves Alice or she would like to be Alice.
Here's how it works, leave any gifts, appetizers and/or libations in the comments. Mingle with the other guests and pop back in out through the course of the day.
It's a very hard life
Anna Letitia Barbauld
I’m currently miserable in a hospital bed. I should go home today, provided the rest of the tests look good.
The essay is a paper that discusses the issue based on the view of author's point. New students are smart sometimes judged not able to prepare an essay for any guidance from the school. So many students who have struggled demonstrate their natural talents in writing because the test ordered them to write with a certain structure. Students are trained to write in a certain formula at the age of 11 to 18 years. As a result, students who later became a student are not able to articulate their ideas in college. So many students who have struggled to overcome the pressure should pursue a decent test scores as well as an essay task they had to do.
T x
Dalbar every year does a survey on Investor Behaviour. There are many factors they discuss in their Quantitative Assessment of Investor Behaviour (QAIB). They also have Investment Behaviour in the title for a reason. Their study shows on may fronts that investor biases and behaviours cause the poorer returns relative to the index.
(weird!)
ok. i'm rambling. have a terrific tuesday and thank you soooooooooo much for coming by.
Pacific Gas And Electric Completes Offering Of 5.625% Senior Notes For $200 Million 28
Carl Rydquist not only took first place in Street RWD with a 1:56.591, but he also managed to shave off an additional 4+ seconds (1:52.487) by switching tires and running in the Limited RWD class in the Berk Technology BMW 135i.
This is my dual-band VHF/UHF radio, and it's mounted under the dashboard just below the commercial radio. This radio is for local communications, and we have many frequencies programmed into both bands. As a special bonus, you can also see some of Georgia's infamous pollen.
How do you find your golf cart among the hundreds of others that are stored at the golf course? Sure, you may have your own "parking spot" but if anyone is like me, I would easily forget where that "parking spot" is. The solution is to personalize it with your own name and stick figures!
Skylanders: Spyro’s Adventure
Among children Type II Diabetes caused by decreased physical activity and poor nutrition leading to obesity has reached epidemic proportions. When a child experiences improper weight gain (because of larger amounts of circulating growth hormone) the child increases the number of fat cells rather than their size (as is the case with adults). Consequently, hyper-cellular obesity is especially hard to reverse later on in life.
This morning, as I sat at the table to write, I heard the creak in the floor upstairs but no television. M got some water from the sink, retraced his steps through the kitchen, but stopped at the table. He pulled out a chair and sat. He asked, "How are you doing?"
And some say what defines us
And then she caught his hand and stopped him. After taking a step ahead she looked at him straight in the eye and said, “When you want me to say the truth, you should also do the same.”
Here’s how the finished foot looked once it was all painted. You can’t even tell there was ever a problem.
Not about my arms, but about how cute this is, and that it's mine, not your's...
of one hell into the worst maw of
In addition to innovative brewing, Mammoth Brewing was one of the first craft breweries to distribute beer in cans. "Putting in a canning line was one of the first things I did at Mammoth, before the sale was even completed," recalls Turner. "We sell most of our beer around Yosemite and putting beer into cans made it much easier for hikers to carry into the forest. We've increased our output by a factor of three since 2006, and going to cans was a big part of that." The second largest region for Mammoth is the Mammoth Mountain Ski Area, as the beer is also popular with skiers.
Later books include recipes for Polish classics: hearty casseroles, a cabbage-and-sausage stew called bigos, and golabki, or stuffed cabbage rolls. Her latest book, published this year, brings together 123 salad recipes.
When he was 13, he wanted to be a Catholic priest – so maybe his later porn career ironically turned out to be less sexually seedy than it might have done. And, in latter days, he bankrolled Mark Thatcher’s failed motor racing career. Perhaps as a thankyou, he was once invited to Downing Street by Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher as “an exemplary entrepreneur”.
Do dangerous things, because I'm that dad.
Activity Report for the period 11 March 1942 to 13 August 1942.
To improve my own life I would change houses to one that had a separate guest house so that it would be easier for friends and family to spend time with us. It would not be a huge mansion but bigger than I have now with a bit more land. I would have a 2nd residence in the US. I would have daily help to do the cleaning washing house keeping and some some cooking, to leave me time to dedicate to creativity and developing other projects.
25. What was your greatest musical discovery?
Peace out,
Next was Felicity Kaya …
I was wondering that too and I asked someone and they said that since Basic H makes water wetter, the Basic H sticks to them and it actually suffocates the ants/bugs.
6. Your Cheatin' Heart
Romeo X Juliet - Vanilla Twilight
ME is a distinct neurological illness and has been classified as such since the 1969 by the WHO in ICD10-G93.3. Fatigue Syndrome has its own classification in F48.
While each figure has good and bad things about it, I prefer the Takara First Edition version. It comes in grays for most of the body, has purple highlights, and has a cartoon accurate gun. This one is the only version with a cartoon accurate gun. The alt mode is ok on both deluxe versions, and the robot is very good, with very little kibble. The AM version does not have the purples like the FE one. Which is fine. In the show so far, Megatron has had two different looks; glowing with purple dark energon and normal with grays, silver and black. So each Takara deluxe version has a different, yet still cartoon accurate color scheme. The AM version has a micron that turns into his gun. unfortunately, the gun is too big and not shaped right. But it is cool to have the micron. The best gimmicks were always when you got another tiny Transformer with the regular one. The worst gimmicks, however have been silly weapons that do something. In this case, we have both; a tiny robot that transforms into a slightly oversized and strangely shaped weapon. Unfortunately, the pegs and holes that hold the micron are large and stand out too much. In some cases they are molded into gun or thruster shapes. In the AM Megatron they look like extra guns on his back or at the base of his wings in vehicle mode. I don’t like them. But anything is better than MechTech. And speaking of that, we have the RID voyager Megatron. His cannon has a light up MechTech feature that brings two blade halves together to make a blade in front of the cannon. This is reminiscent of the cartoon, but it makes the cannon way too big, the blade too short and does not stay when you release the button. You can manually twist the blade parts around so the blade will stay out. It does not look quite right, but it is close. The cannon looks bad on the alt mode, but since the alt mode looks horrible from any direction but the top, it is par for the course. The robot mode is mostly nice, but suffers from too much kibble on the back. The color scheme is a washed out pale, with purple clear plastic and a few silver and gray highlights. I like the fact that this is a voyager size Megatron. It should be leader size, but this will work. Megatron should be twice the size of the regular characters like Bumblebee or Ratchet. This one is only a few inches taller. The deluxe versions are much better molds though.
Remember his sparkling blue eyes.’
I made a few things this year for Mother's Day gifts..can't post those cause the special ladies haven't opened them yet, but I did want to share two of the cards I made to honor the special mother's in our life.
I called out Burns on his unfair reporting by email, and he quickly replied with a squealing retort (guilty conscious?), claiming that it was I the weasel because I voiced my disapproval from behind the safety of my computer screen, whatever that means.
I chose the above picture from her blog for this session because it shows just one example of Christina's everyday elegance while she's spending time with her little ones.
For years I hated beets. As a child I use to eat Borscht and loved it, but then one day I had a bad batch and well, I don't even want to tell you what they tasted like, let alone smelled like.
Friday in a week in which I work on Saturday.
Like homicide detectives, journalists speak for the dead.
Hot.
It seems that political subjectivity is shifting with the age of the internet, and it’s imperative that we understand these new networked formations. Certainly they seem to be understanding us, for as quasi-living organisms, like memes, they speak, think, act, and feel in and through us. And it seems to me that if our society tends to want to push these towards centralized, paranoid formations, the world might be a less scary place if we could help push in the other direction, towards more distributed forms of subjectivity.
After some questioning, agents handed Inn a slip of paper, and let him in. He pocketed it, not knowing what it was for, and forgot about it.
Okay, so the Princess is in this circus too, right? And her amazing talent is… bubble dancing! Seriously. She dances seductively in a bubble for all the circus to see. She’s not naked or anything. She just… shimmies and OMGSTOPJUDGINGMEPLEASE.
Yesterday, we were driving and hiking through the Joshua Tree National Forest, which has the most amazing landscapes. Big boulders strewn around, desert forests of gorgeous and unusual cacti like the Joshua tree, high promontories, sweeping valleys, beautiful light; it is really very unique. Leah described it as “a cross between being caught in a Dr. Seuss book and being on Mars”.
